Saint Paul's is like some demented rave, although the soaring majesty of the building is only added to. The bells are ringing out proud and hard drowning out the tribal techno beats.
Suspicion is the 11th book in the Private series, but it’s readable as a standalone; the plot is self-contained, and even though you come across characters that have obviously been in the previous books, and events from previous books are mentioned, if you can over look that you don’t know about the things being referred to, as they’re not entirely important to this story, it’s fine.
So: Baxter takes himself seriously. But if he doesn’t, who will? He is not at pains to come across as affable, and as a result I liked him all the more. Or do I mean I liked his book all the more? This is a book with no About the Author page; the entire book is about the author. One might say that that is true of any book, and that Baxter is just more honest about it.
perhaps to new flakes
“At the same time, every man originally thinks that he will receive the same rejection from the same touching of the woman’s buttocks.
I was genuinely surprised to receive these awards, but am very touched that Sophie, Juliette and Di included me in their choices. I understand with these awards there are rules, and that I should select five bloggers to pass them on to. The problem is I really love all the blogs that I follow, and would like to give you all an award, so how can I possibly choose? Well.....
The mountains may be moist or dry, but they tend to be scraped free of much vegetation, even as this may show the hand of man and not nature as the preserves shrink for habitats amidst an always-increasing population, often in sensitive political as well as environmental zones. "The mountains gave man soil, provided him with food, and stored his water, but he has taken almost everything, leaving the earth's bones bare. The snow leopard might well serve as symbol of man's commitment to the natural world." (50) I read this wondering how this predicament might have altered since. (Amazon US 3-14-2012, "pi" day.)
Tony Stark is the most defined character so far, having one movie under his belt after his origin story. The Iron Man in The Avengers is exactly the Iron Man we’ve come to expect. Though he’s less of a womaniser due to the much-delayed relationship with Pepper, he is still arrogant, charming and the clear choice as leader and to have a monologue battle with the god of mischief. His portrayal is completely consistent with what we’ve seen before, and he is completely believable as the future driving-force of the superhero team (if the cartoon and movie ending are anything to go by).
As you'll see, I'm a bit behind on that last resolution. My reading challenges are still of 2011 vintage and dare I say it most of them are sadly incomplete. The planning of holidays on the other hand has been sorted (London last month, Tokyo this month) so at least I have set aside time too read.
Brooklyn 2007 Monster
Captain Beefheart- Old Fart At Play
Close the grill and let cook for 5-7 minutes. Turn the sandwich - the top should now be browned and crispy and your cheese starting to melt. Close the grill again and cook for another 5 minutes or until cooked to your happiness!
Would you ever consider a proposal for a series from a new author, or do you prefer stand alone books?
When you realize there is nothing lacking,
The next day I was on a train crossing the Tamar Bridge between Devon and Cornwall, musing on the possibility of train crashes, and the conductor announced an accident on the line. We stopped, and waited, and waited. The train was emptied and cancelled at Plymouth and we were told there had been a fatality on the line at the next station. My thoughts immediately ran to suicide, (although we were not given any more details) and my throat was dry, my heart fast. How final and quick death is, how commonplace, how shocking, how irreversible. I wondered who, how, why, if only, what if. Restless people in my carriage started to call home, announcing the delay, laughing (really)
Pants- Monterray – Prism (free)
I call upon all Malaysians who love freedom and justice to rally
… etc.
Text and Pics: Adrián Soto
It's Easter and I have a really cute nail art design to share with you all today. I love Pink and I like bunnies so I thought this design would be perfect. If you want to see how you can create this really cute Easter nail art design, just keep reading :)
All through the Bible God uses what he has.
I was going to stop at Russell's in Bloomsburg for lunch, but when I called to make sure they were open, I was told that they were closed till 4:00...the place was being sold, and they were in closing; they would re-open at 4 with new owners. Yow! Hope it stays largely the same. I wound up stopping in Lewisburg at the Towne Tavern for a chili cheeseburger and a Sam Adams Lager. There were Landshark Lager signs everywhere. Kinda odd; we don't see any of that down here around Philly. Interesting. Good burger, but far from phenomenal; the onion rings were pretty great, though.
Because they have learned to eat... because they know that dairy and breads aren't NECESSARY for life.
Soil clings to my boots and slows my speed
Where at one time in the service if we got called to a stupid job it would be one of a few in a 24 hour period…now it seems we are being called to 99% stupid jobs and the real emergencies are the ones that end up having to wait for an available crew!!! Over the past months I have been late off every single shift. No crew or RRV dare call clear with even just one minute to go to the end of the shift as it is guaranteed they will get a job. We seem to be forced into enforced overtime when all we want is proper breaks and getting off on time! Not much to ask is it?
Les Moonves once told me ALMOST PERFECT was the best show he ever cancelled. Somehow that didn’t make me feel any better.
52.4 percent: movie star
The driving role reversal has been awesome..
Tire size bamboo containers stand head high as their contents steam over boiling water. Wait-staff come around to each table lifting the lid of the bamboo steamers revealing delectable bite size dumplings. You point to what you want and are charged by the plate. This is my second time here.
Tuesday, 17 April, 2012 at 17:49 (05:49 PM) UTC RSOE
The tea set, as you can see is more than enough food for two. They had us picked 3 scones, 2 types of sandwiches, and a dessert. Can I tell you that on paper it may not sounds like alot, but in reality, it's alot of bread and sugar.
Call me a simple suburbanite, but I've never seen anything like it in my life. The blinged out train was awash with colorful lights and joyous holiday signs. It had the equivalent space of a train car decked out with an open-air Santa scene worthy of any shopping mall. It was delightful. The kind of thing you cannot look at without breaking into a smile.
Later, we add in some positives, words that intend to be encouraging but are in fact equally as bossy. DO clean up your toys. DO say please and thank you. DO flush and wash your hands.
and face them one by one
So as you can see, I have been truly spoilt. Zol cooked me a very tasty meal tonight, which always means a lot to me. I also received a new top and jeans today, and I am having my hair cut and coloured on Saturday with my Birthday money. (Long overdue now, its starting to resemble a haystack!)
First of all, in America in the early 1900s, most women did not work outside the home. Even spinsters who had no husbands to provide for them usually lived with relatives and provided help in rearing the younger generations. Some few worked at 'female' jobs like schoolteacher or nurse or clerical work. Many did not. Men dominated the work force, and they were given preference for many jobs simply because it was assumed they had to work for a living, whereas most women were engaged in domestic life. Hiring a woman for a particular job was depriving male breadwinners a job, at least in popular thinking. Only the two world wars and the consequence of a reduced male population opened the job market to large numbers of women. And not until the feminist revolution of the 1970s and onward did 'most women' work full-time.
If what are deemed to be the negative passages from the Koran need to be contextualised and/or interpreted, according to some but certainly not all Muslims, then so too do the positive passages. (This never seems to happen.) For example, we are told that there are passages in the Koran that speak against suicide. Thus they must also speak against suicide bombers. But what if someone contextualises the passages about suicide and turns them into pro-suicide arguments (as the bombers do)?
Holy God, Holy Mighty One, Holy Immortal One, have mercy on us and on the whole world.
Before I close, I wish to welcome my newest blog follower, “mommymystic” to “This Is Who I AM.” Perhaps this time I shall, indeed, have thirteen new followers before the next Full Moon on Monday, June 4, 2012. I wonder who shall have the opportunity to have his or her question answered free of charge by Robert Alvarez, the Psychic Witch, if and when that happens. As a late and great Capricorn used to say, “Time tells every story.” Thank you.
To be given the key that opens the door to our “aha moment house”
2. Go paperless. Its the latest rage. There are countless software systems where you can do this. Even Legal and Real Estate documents can be digitally signed now. Its legal!! Not to mention it saves on the filing systems. Its all online.
FB: Wouldn’t this mean that these problems that white people suffer from are basically self-inflicted?
In the same way, when Jesus saw a widow following behind the coffin of her only son, “He had compassion on her and said to her, ‘Do not weep’” (Luke 7:13) before touching her son’s body and raising him from the dead.
Victims feel shame because there’s a perception/expectation that you are treated the way you deserve – that if you remain in a relationship (romantic, work, friends, family, any type) that makes you feel bad; it’s because you must want to or deserve to be treated poorly.
And it seems he is carrying that practice on into Ministerial life.
Laurie xx
And I love this little tree. SO easy to make! Isn't it great when a simple project gives you that big WOW! factor you're going for?! I may just have to host my own Cookie Swap after seeing all the beautiful and inspiring project for this month's Spotlight. Click on the a|s Spotlight tab about to see more inspiring photos and all of the Spotlight details! And if you really love it, email me and we can set up YOUR VERY OWN WORKSHOP featuring the current Spotlight features or anything else that you'd like to make. I do workshops all over the New England/Seacoast area and New Jersey when I'm in the area. I'd love to get crafty with you and your friends! Email me with your contact info and we will set something up. I have a few spots left but they are going to go soon....don't miss it!
Today was one of those latter, disorienting days.
Then Dad comes in with a great big book
5) Attitude
I will be on the lookout for an "assailant" with several companions. Thanks... (March 26, 2012, by seahawkrostermanreturns) MORE
In addition, many of the services that are necessary to ITER are currently powered by fossil fuels--though one must admit that ITER's location in France means it is more dependent on the power generation of conventional fission reactors than it would be elsewhere. But even those fission reactors are heavily dependent on fossil fuels for their servicing.
As of this moment, there have been 41 views of that piece and exactly three people have made guesses. To be fair, I asked that anyone who actually knows me in the real world restrain from blurting out the answers, lest I brand them as “tools”. I find it a little difficult to believe that of those 41 readers, only three of them don’t know me in the real world. For one thing, I’m fairly confident that I don’t actually know 38 people who read all that much.
Recently, somewhere in Texas, I took a photo. It will be the second photo below.
He’s weird, he’s got issues, but yet there is something attractive about him. He likes woman and he knows that if he hangs out with the lesbians long enough, he’ll find what I call a, “straight stray” – a woman who just wasn’t sure about her sexuality. But, now she’s hooking up with her lesbian friend’s Lez Luther, and now she’s pretty sure…(thanks to Lez Luther’s faithful tutelage) that she’s a straight.
I wanted the card to match the box...but not exactly. I used a Grand Labels 4 and stitched the first layer to the base. The blue label is a Nestabilities Label 5, topped with a Parisian Accents die and a standard circle small.
Turn.
So far, the dishes that have been successful are:
Charlotte is no fainting female, instead she is smart, sharp-witted, and quick to take care of herself. The male characters pale somewhat in comparison, but they are still well developed. RANSOME’S QUEST is a very interesting story, and I hope to see more historicals along this nature by Ms. Dacus. $13.99. 352 pages.
Contact: Scrappingville +603 228 44302
Emerson
So that's one massive check on my vacation To-Do list! The KING quilt is finished, so it's time to get cracking on some of these other projects floating around the sewing room. The next focus is to get my two UFO goddesses finished and another 2 designed on paper.
DOCTOR: Are you depressed?
To address this challenge, we are working to help our partners bring needed services closer to clients, which will make saving accounts more accessible, convenient, and more likely to be used. Some delivery channels we are currently looking at are:
times as I was growing up.
Don't really like the sweet, tart caramel malt flavours. For me it's re@pellant and disgusting.
My early curiosity about what had brought everyone else here was answered. What they shared was very confronting, grim, inspiring, interesting, moving and startling.
18. In the north east of the country, girls are called “quines” and boys “louns”.
Row 4- ch1, turn, sc in each sc and ch. Finish off.
In his own words, the song is “a loose interpretive cover song based on the writings of Friedrich Nietzsche and something having to do with a Tiesto featuring Nelly Furtado track”. The obvious references of God being dead are present and they combine effortlessly with a semi-borrowed melodic incorporation of “Who Wants To Be Alone” by the world’s most sought after progressive trance DJ and eclectic pop superstar.
Offer a mix of multiple choice and open (text answer) questions. Splitting your survey with both specific and open-ended questions will encourage readers to pay closer attention to their answers. It also lets them know that you have real interest in what they have to say (rather than forcing them to only select from a list of your suggestions).
Shortly before he was murdered a year later - hacked to death so brutally that he was unrecognisable -- ailing Ventersdorp farmer Eugene Terre’Blanche, leader of the Afrikaner Resistance Movement (AWB), also often referred to the extreme cruelty of the Lotter women’s torture-murders in media interviews. Terre’Blanche had led the peaceful protest actions at the Odendaalsrust law courts when the suspects had made their first remand appearances and applied for bail in April 2009. The Boer protestors carried out a graphic re-enactment of the way in which the Lotter women had been put to death and also demanded the return of the death sentence for such cruel race-hate crimes.. Their reenactment was so graphic that it had shocked many onlookers and caused outrage in the Afrikaans-language news media.
TAKE RESPONSIBILITY.
They are waiting for a signal. The news reporting of mass decloakings
Mark Leyshon, from Alcohol Concern, said: "Research shows that children who are exposed to alcohol advertising and promotion are more likely to start to use alcohol, have positive expectations about alcohol, and to drink more if they are already using alcohol.
Cirsium rivulare 'Atropurpureum' delights in boggy conditions or heavy clay soil. It's surprising that it does so well in our predominantly sandy soil. It grows to about 4ft tall, and has plum-coloured flowers and leaves that are serrated but hardly prickly at all.
- Owners of non-software patents are far more likely to win their cases than are software patent owners (37.1% versus 12.9% overall)
The Pen award is given to writers who have been persecuted or imprisoned for exercising the right to freedom of expression.
Now, some of you may be wondering why I have 'colouring medium' on the above list when I've used a CD image!!! well I thought it looked a bit 'washed out' so I coloured the regency lady with some of my new Spectrum Noir pens (I think these may become as well loved as my promarkers!)
The long awaited Fire Walker was next. Now, I haven’t brought it up yet but there were mini obstacles in-between the main ones. They would have random water pits, muddy hills, rock piles, etc to toss in our path and there just so happened to be a mud water pit right before Fire Walker. This obstacle was a maze of burning foliage with flames as high as I was. The firemen were there to control it but we had to run through it. I held my breath as best I could and began running through it but it was super hot, burned my eyes and my exhaustion made me take a breath and boy was it bad. I immediately started coughing terribly. I also tightened both my calves doing this because they went from cold to hot really fast. I had to stretch them out for the next obstacle that was immediately after Fire Walker, which was Everest.
‘I’m afraid she’s really quite unwell,’ he says. ‘I don’t think this is a meningococcal rash, but I’m worried about her low oxygen levels, her temperature and general condition. Have you been giving her anything? Any paracetamol?’
For rape survivor and “infidelity photographer”, Terri Welker, the question is far greater than should she answer. The question is: What should she do now that she has been found? Run again? Or stay and fight for the new life she has created photographing cheating spouses for James Boston Investigations?
This will be the first year we send out a photo Christmas card. Since we now have the most adorable little boy to show off, I am excited to pick out one of Shutterfly's gorgeous cards! The only problem is the are SO MANY to choose from! I want to send a different style to everyone we know, just so I don't have to choose only one! Here are a few that I am thinking of getting...
and while she did have lots of fun while she was away, she has shared with us how much she has missed you all and is so
4 searching
Last weekend we added apple-juicing to our list of countrified activities. We learned how apples go from this
Also prepared, that's another good word for how I am feeling.
Always experimenting with new flavors, she recently created the Latin-inspired alfajor cupcake. The name: Don't Cry for Me Argentina.
Famous words of the the person who’s not interested in committing. If I had a dollar for every time I have had an individual point out a flaw/error/oversight/etc all the while couching it behind – “Has anyone thought this through?”
One of the themes in the comments yesterday was sharing how we keep things organized. After many false starts and different methods starting kindergarten this year, we finally found our perfect solution. This weekly calendar, found at Target:
With punishment, maybe Andrei Kostitsyn and Alexander Radulov will realize that their team, teammates, and fans take this series very seriously and would appreciate that, no matter how old and rambunctious they are, they are professional athletes that should act as such.
“We are excited to announce the premiere of VICTOR by Victor Costa on ShopNBC! Victor will be debuting an entirely new line of fashion separates for women on May 24 beginning at 10am ET,” it said.
A discovery that either has an expiration date or a date of detonation, I cannot tell.
We are unable to add any more cards to our slide show as that website is closing down. If you know of any other slide show sites you can recommend, I would love to hear from you. But I have started a new board at my Pinterest site here: http://pinterest.com/khasheck/send-a-smile-4-kids-favorite-cards/ where you can see the top three cards from our challenges as well as some of my favorite TEAM S.A.S. cards.
But Romney also is challenging Santorum’s commitment to conservative principles in light of votes the former Pennsylvania senator says he now regrets.
One of my fave base colors along with shades or gray and some soft blue/greens.
Moreover, the red-colored spits are scattered all over the town are a disgust for some tidy watchers. After some deliberations and pulses, it’s enough for me to agree not to ban it. Well the culture in theCordillerasis so rich that it transcends the modern living and sanitary norms. Although I do believe that they should not spit anywhere and just paint the town red, I think that this part of culture is meant to be preserved not because I want them to have oral diseases but because it’s only one of the few cultural acts in thePhilippinesthat is not touched by modernization.
Answer: B.
In fact, just as happened with the German Stalinists, in the 1930's, the promotion of Nationalist politics simply acted to legitimise them. Faced with a choice, those workers attracted to these Nationalist solutions, did the obvious thing, they voted for the consistent Nationalists, the Nazis, the BNP, and now in France the FN.
Take 70g softened butter and beat until creamy.
Being a writer is something I've always wanted to be. For a long time I tried to write clever, rather pretentious stories that were really, really bad and stopped. However, a few years ago I started working as an intern at a couple of different children's publishers and started to rethink the idea of becoming a writer again. Working in that environment made me start thinking it was something I could actually do again, but instead of being “clever”, I tried to come up with a story that would be simply entertaining, fun, and interesting, rather than something that would shake the very foundations of the literary world.
He also refused to open a case after Nic Lubbe, 51, from Kempton Park West, his daughter, Antoenet Cronjé, and her two sons, Morné, 11, and Kyle, 3, were assailed by robbers on Monday night.
I was appalled. How dare she? I had written a great book report about a great book. I did more than the stupid assignment called for.
By many a field and fallow,
Technology isn’t the answer to everything. And people won’t use technology if it’s more hassle than doing it the low-tech way.
12 lollipop sticks
I decided on veggie burgers, as I have a ton of cans of chick peas in the house.
The last time me was at the vet was for my shots 2 years ago in Calgary. me went to a special cat vet and they all had to wear gloves and me still managed to bite one of the helpers right through her glove! Me was the incredible NINJA cat!
Woven among Leah’s many roles as student, mother, wife, friend and employee, were vibrant threads of compassion, creativity, perseverance and passion. She shared it all – generously and graciously with her humble and unpretentious ways. She was one of the most alive and giving people I have ever known and she changed the course of my life in so many ways. Her untimely death left a space in my heart that I have filled with quilting. I like to think the quilt on my bed today sings Leah’s song.
Well it's that time again........ time for another challenge over at Anything Goes... We had some fabulous entries for the Tick Tock theme... pop over to the blog HERE to see if you were a winner!
1 Tbsp Pine Nuts
I love my Craft Scrubbie by Ranger Ink! This wonderful little scrubber gets nearly all (if not all) the ink & gunk off your hands after a messing bout of crafting (a great buy for less than $5)! And somehow I always seem to work up to the minute I have to go somewhere, and by getting this scrubbie wet and adding some liquid soap I'm able to clean up quickly & efficiently--and totally safe for the kiddos too. I highly recommend this little beauty! Which leads me to my little repurposed project today -- When I first got it I would leave my scrubbie on the sink and then pack it back in the plastic packaging for my craft bag, but it fit SO well into one of those travel soap containers that I started carting it around with me in one of those.
Where boggy lands majestic fern and wild flower meet
Under the Afrikaners, the blacks enjoyed a standard of life far above that of any other African state. By any measure –infant mortality, literacy, life expectancy, you name it– South African blacks were better off than their neighbors — so much so that the latter began to leave their civil-war torn countries for peaceful South Africa.
N.B. The author has defined a disequilibrium model as one that rejects “either or both of”
the Democrats are, if not vociferously, at least tacitly in support of
Example 4:
- hole punch - i used my big bite puncher
EPC is also concerned about how the decision by Justice Theis may lead to more people, who are not otherwise dying, being dehydrated to death or being denied basic care, based on too low a standard for writing living will or power of attorney documents.
Another thing that makes everything better is the fact that I’m in fact, marrying Danny. A few times we’ve just randomly said to each other, “I can’t wait to be married”; it’s an awesome feeling thinking about the future. Yes, I want it to be the best party ever, but if it’s not perfect, and we still end up married, it will be a success.
I had fun creating the droplets of colors with distress inks and water. This trigger has so many excellent entries. Have fun checking them out!
This 17-page file contains all of the things you will need to hold a Ma Spa for Mother's Day or an end of the year "thank you". Here's a sample of some of the pages:
We invite you to join us on our journey. Follow our blog as we explore the history of our neighborhood through the stories of people who have lived it. In February, we will be designing our project and recruiting people to tell their stories. Do you know someone with a story? Let us know.
You don’t have to have a blog to play along with the sketch challenge. If you upload your project to any on-line galleries or forums, please use the keyword of WMSC80. As always you are welcome and encouraged to upload your project to your album in the Waltzingmouse Stamps Gallery!
1 x (2623)Dettol Disinfectant Spray - Morning Dew = 9.70
me: do you have any problem holding?
ISO : 400
8 results as the multiplication of the powers of the Divine father in their extension through the Son; (2×2=4) x 2=8. On the tree this is played out graphically by the paths leading first from Kether to Chokmah, thence to Chesed, and so on to Tiphireth and finally Hod. Baphomet is the great androgyny, the spermatozoon pure creative energy.
My queen deserves a starlit crown her own,
opposite side of this Victorian coin is the realization that as long
It's been ages since I've posted....I've been super busy...but it's time to catch up. Please know that I've been reading all your blogs and keeping up to date with everyone even if I haven't commented much.
and shutters galore in greens and blues and
(By appointment only.)
Had six kids with six different people,
First, it snowed yesterday before my first final. Snowed people. People are stupid here when it snows. So there's that. Oh yeah, I also finished my first final! Woo-hoo! Now only if three weren't three others to take...
On Saturday we popped in for a livener, as we were in town before meeting Mr Wolfe for dinner in Fitzrovia. I had just intended to have a swift pint, but down from the kitchen came the chef with a platter of veggie sausage rolls. I just had to have one, and so did Mab and Old Nick. Despite the thermo-nuclear temperature of the filling (aubergine, courgette, peppers,onion etc) they were so good, we devoured them in record time, leaving a small mountain of flaky pastry crumbs on the bar top.
You can follow this hop using the DCC hop button on my left border or at the end of this post.
But writhes confused
Unions said the jobs losses amounted to eight per cent of Tata's UK workforce, pledging to try to mitigate the impact of the decision, while Labour said it was a "hugely worrying" sign for industry.
seeing the shapes of the white oaks now before leaves cover all
Pete stripped off his sweat-drenched shirt, leaving him in just his ripped shorts and worn sandals. Just as Pete started to climb down into the hole, Luis heard him mutter something about "rats." The American then climbed back out, picked up a large branch off the ground, presumably to use to club rats, then descended into the cave-like hole.
For nearly a decade, 34-year-old Claire Waverley, at peace with her family inheritance, has lived in the house alone, embracing the spirit of the grandmother who raised her, ruing her mother’s unfortunate destiny and seemingly unconcerned about the fate of her rebellious sister, Sydney, who freed herself long ago from their small town’s constraints. Using her grandmother’s mystical culinary traditions, Claire has built a successful catering business — and a carefully controlled, utterly predictable life — upon the family’s peculiar gift for making life-altering delicacies: lilac jelly to engender humility, for instance, or rose geranium wine to call up fond memories. Garden Spells reveals what happens when Sydney returns to Bascom with her young daughter, turning Claire’s routine existence upside down. With Sydney’s homecoming, the magic that the quiet caterer has measured into recipes to shape the thoughts and moods of others begins to influence Claire’s own emotions in terrifying and delightful ways.
The U.S. Chamber of Commerce, the TransAtlantic Business Dialogue, the Emergency Committee for American Trade, the National Association of Manufacturers, the United States Council for International Business and the National Foreign Trade Council issued the following statement in light of the U.K. announcement that it was pursuing a public consultation regarding plain packaging for tobacco products.
And if you think that imposing a minimum unit price would do anything whatsoever to bring more customers into pubs, when the reasons for the decline of pubs are far more varied and complex than simply price, you are sorely deluded and indeed playing into the hands of the anti-drink lobby.
Big and bad is the way this porter plays the game! A robust deep brown body with a balanced, mild sweetness, Terry’s is the perfect compilation of 4 malts and hops making this one an instant Portland classic.
Anyway, so everyone wants to have millions, and this is the book that tells how. No magical mystery tour to it, just good economic principles that work when applied.
I had this fear that if I went alone...I would be alone. Ever have that fear? The fear kinda reminded me of a fear at lunch time during school.
Milk from the dairy cows was used for butter and cheese such as pressed crowdie. Everything was stored outside in the cold store secure from vermin. There was no refrigeration. Food was used straight away if it was perishable. The farm made its own oatcakes but not its own bread.
XXXV
Charlotte is such a good baby. She really is ALMOST always happy and easy to please. That being said these pictures were not during her finest moment. I think I tried to manage her schedule to much that day and it backfired. Like I said it wasn't her best couple of hours. Our friend in Omaha took the pictures and bless her soul, she was so patient and managed to get some great shots despite my child being a little grump. Thanks so much Mandy!!!!
Another corner of the ground floor has Thomas and Friends sets stacked up high. The set with the bridge costs RM140 (normal outside selling for RM199.90 if not mistaken!) and the one with Creaky Cranky the Crane cost RM105 (selling for RM149.90 if not mistaken).
100ml warm water
17. A spiky, poisonous and malicious plant, the thistle was traditionally used in Scotland as a mark of Cain, to stigmatise the outcast, the degenerate and the marginal. Remnants of the practice can be seen in such names as Partick Thistle, Inverness Caledonian Thistle, and Scottish rugby. If you see a man wearing a thistle in his lapel today, he's probably a Conservative or a paedophile.
The most disturbing was the press statement delivered by the MK veterans outside Luthuli House.
formula. It
I heard the news and I am so excited!! I made the team!! WHOOT WHOOT, you have no idea how happy I am about this because I have been a fan of Basically Bare. I saw them for the first time last year at CHA and I knew as soon as I put my greedy little hands on their albums that I was in love. My mind was spinning instantly envisioning all kinds of albums I could make, I was so excited. Well I am so happy to hear that I get to make my basically bare albums now till my hearts content.
Those new to the game got to see a few new things, like the whole “climbing up walls” mechanic in the game. And they got to see a few odd things, like odd way some quests share group credit when one of the group hits a milestone, and some quests do not. For example, we all got credit when one of us defeated the sparring partner in the combat tutorial. Why would you set the flag for shared credit for that quest? Meanwhile, a few quests later, we had a “kill 8″ quests that shared no credit. Odd.
I was quite disappointed with the newly opened AEON Station 18. Since AEON Station 18 is the largest, latest and 'hippest' shopping mall in Ipoh, I'd expect a better shopping environment with more international brands commonly found in KL or Penang. However, the more I anticipated, the more disappointment I got.
Mr. Brooks - Who the hell said that it was okay for Kevin Costner to start making movies again? When William Hurt is the most prestigious name attached to a project (Dane Cook? Seriously?), and his character is actually just a figment of someone's imagination, then there are a couple of Hollywood producers who need to go into high-concept 12-step right away.
I go into dispatch and they tell me that her bail was just posted. I laugh because I know that she was filed out of custody and that paperwork doesn’t mean a thing. It also means that most likely who ever paid that money just lost it.
So far no other team have gone for low wide cooling outlets, but equally contrary to the rumour mils no teams has adopted front exit exhausts either. It will be interesting if any team follows Renaults solution in either of these areas.
Okay. How much will a new iPhone 4 cost?
"No additional product will be entering the state," Manis said.
Total Lots Sold: 36
06 One In A 1,000,000
Celebrating Lunar New Year: Year of the Dragon
Wednesdays
The 10 pm set will be saxophonist Hayes Greenfield and his trio. Looking forward...
“Chances are there are at least 50 people in eastern Colorado who will say, ‘What the heck, we’ve seen way bigger hail than that!’” Doesken said. “That’s good, but they will need to prove their claim – by providing the stone itself or eyewitness reports along with excellent photos showing the stone with rulers or other known objects.”
Post Script: Curious as to why it's No. 287?
I’m sleepy…0.0
While I would hesitantly agree that Acts 1:7 may perhaps reflect the disciples’ misunderstanding of the kingdom, it would only be in terms of their not knowing the breadth of it, not its location. Note that Jesus offers no correction to their statement, only that it didn’t belong to them to know the timing of its arrival.
* Not getting the hint. It all goes back to social cues. I am no enigma. My demeanor, tone and actual words used say it all. You'd have to be a total imbecile to not get when I want to be left alone… when I don't want to take the relationship to the next level, but yet it seems to be a constant problem. I need space, I need alone time, I need breaks from just about everyone I know. If I self impose seclusion, it's for a reason. If I don't answer 1-3 texts in a row within a fifteen minute window, maybe it would be a good idea to stop sending them. If I turn down dinner repeatedly, chances are I don't want to go. Sorry, but it's true. The flip side is, if I ever genuinely reach out, people know I mean it. Surely there has to be something valuable in that.
So I’m in my 20s, unmarried and somehow own a Dutch oven. Don’t ask, I know this isn’t the norm. I cooked my red wine braised short ribs in the Dutch oven – a one pot shop – which did make the cooking and clean up easier, but this could easily be transferred from a large, deep pan to a crockpot or slow cooker if you don’t have one.
What frustrates you?
When we want to look at something we usually “throw a little light on it”… ie we hit it with photons.
On October 31, 2011, the Contracts and Technology Committees discussed Int. 707 in a hearing entitled, “Managing NYC Government IT Contracts”. Additionally, in the last year Council Member Letitia James’ has introduced legislation that would create a New York City Chief Procurement Officer who would publish and submit to the Mayor, City Council, and City Comptroller an annual report detailing information on City contracts. She has also introduced legislation that would establish a task force on best practices in City procurement and disposal.
I can cook. I can clean. But as of late, my house looks like 12 boys and 14 dogs live here. There are always dishes in the sink, there's almost nothing in the fridge, and last night the big decision was whether to order onion rings or zucchini sticks with dinner.
After baking the cheesecake in a water bath for 90 minutes, I propped open the oven door with a wooden spoon and allowed it continue to "luxuriate in it's warm bath" (as Dorie put it) for another hour. Then I took it out and let it come to room temperature, before wrapping it up in saran wrap and putting it in the fridge overnight.
Then Sarah and Armen were surprised by the brides maids that the original band from Bob and Barbara's bar played their first dance song "Can't keep my eyes off of you" This is the song they danced to when they first went out together. They were expecting to dance to the recorded version! What a sweet gift!
And I saw that there was something amiss. For there was indeed poop, in the potty.
“Sssshhhhh, be quite already! It doesn’t hurt that bad!” whisper-yelled Ishcandar to the creature below waving his arms to try to encourage the creature to shut up. That did not help. So the Hobbits exited the chamber, and slowly creaked the door shut, at which point the gate locked again. They were mightily relieved and stood panting while the creature caught fully on fire from head to toe, and gave out a few more horrible shrieks before falling silent.
Paris sometimes reminds me of a bad relationship. There are reasons to stay in these toxic situations, and as many reasons to leave them.
The following morning, the Turners are on a drag sled behind Jonah's horse and Avram is standing next to his father's grave. Hex asks Avram how he kept resetting the fire. The Turners kept hanging around trying to put it out, otherwise it would have been a lot more difficult locating them. Avram says that he was with April and doc the whole time. It must have been a miracle.
05 I Want To Sing That Rock & Roll 3:15
To quote Albert Einstein: "Science without Religion is lame, Religion without Science is blind." - 1941, Science, Phylosophy and Religion: A Symposium.
Sex Crime (1984)--Eurythmics
Recently, my bitterness toward the girl scouts came back though when my mom and I attempted to make “Samoa’s” {aka caramel delites, aka the best girl scout cookie} clones from a recipe on pinterest. Yep, some of you already know which recipe I am talking about- it is literally all. over. It is the recipe from the blog “Once upon a plate“. Well, droolers, you have been warned. These cookies take FOREVER and they are TEDIOUS. Delicious? Yes. But they will take you hours and they will NOT be as beautiful as the pictures on “Once upon’s” blog.
B: Batman…of course.
This was the last trip I remember where we forgot our camera, which was unfortunate given some of the unique sights we saw: Smurf-like mushrooms, clear ocean views and red-sky sunsets.
* (The details of the surveys have been sourced from the book, Untouchability in Rural India, authored by Ghanshyam Shah, Harsh Mander, Sukhadeo Thorat, Satish Deshpande and Amita Baviskar published by SAGE Publications, New Delhi,2006).
So as the years pass and your jacket gets patched and waxed there comes a time when the rain just can’t be held off anymore and a replacement is inevitable, so a new jacket comes on board but what of the old? Ebay, charity shop, no! My Barbour’s of past (also including a Hardy’s wading waxed jacket) remain hung up in the hallway like books all with stories to tell and all with tattered covers.
Denise is an excellent cook and despite having three carnivores, two vegetarians and a vegan she made an excellent meal.
Into the Red Deer next I was bowled over by an inescapable smell of chorizo. Thing is, I love chorizo - tis the food of heaven. Alas I couldn't see what on the menu featured it and besides had my eye on a decent piece of fish in the fridge at home, so stopped only for a half amidst some salacious disappointment. I had half a Broadside from Adnams, which was thicker and more nutty than I remember. I'm sure the sparkler ruins the more subtle nutty flavours in this beer!
and the things that I enjoy doing.
So, all’s well that ends well, except for the dull ache in the back of the thighs and still – even now – all these weeks later she still has a tendency to blush when anyone offers her a teacake.
Needless to say this has not gone down well with SZC, and as such it has asked that the pub remove all references to the characters.
"YOGURT!!!!!"
Today was a day where I had to keep quality and exposure separated. I possibly deal with Executive Function Dysfunction. It doesn't clip my grasp at greatness it just means I have to work really hard at "a consistent quality of performance".
Press 1 if you are the youngest male adult in your household.
She looked to one side, then back at him, and quickly pushed herself up to half-sitting. Her head jerked nervously as she looked around. “I’m not sure. How did we get back to the First Realm?”
So I have my bike now and it feels as though everything is coming together for our trip, only a few more things to get and we can be on our way.
by the hard button of a period.
I’﻿d be all fur-lined
The pressure of all this is taking a toll on my personality and I lashed out at my husband about it. So many of our weekends have been compromised by other events that I have no spare time to catch up. Some have been for pleasure. Thanks to Spring Break. Some have been due to family emergencies. Which you can't blame.
It's here David Cameron still has to prove himself. Will he lead a muscular liberal coalition that brings true liberalisation to Britain's public services and with it much improved service and efficiency? Or will he allow the left's preferred definition of the word liberal to prevail, an option that pollsters would tell him would be the best option. In which case we'll miss the greatest opportunity for decades to setup the high quality and high value health service that we need.
Brouwerij Van Eecke N.V. Het Kapittel Abt
The More You Know: Ew, and the mother of the murdery kid also gave him salvia (in addition to the shotgun). The story reminds me of that thing in America where it's illegal to do pretty much anything except churn out a bunch of kids and then be a horrible parent who ruins lives.
I'll woo you like a soldier, at arms' end,
6) Nefarium - Ad Discipulum
Jackson and I had a knock-down, drag-out fight before his nap this afternoon about…what else…wearing clothes! He prefers to NOT go outside during the day because he has to get clothes on and clothes are “not good.” He has MAJOR! issues with clothes and I’m hoping he isn’t developing some sort of anxiety because of it. Today, he seriously sounded like a crazy person…
“You’re behaving generously, old boy, and, you know, one needs a devil of a lot of tact to get people to forgive one one’s generosity. Fortunately women are frivolous and they very quickly forget the benefits conferred upon them. Otherwise, of course, there’d be no living with them.
a. Words create impressions, images and expectations. They build psychological connections. They influence how we think. Since thoughts determine actions, there’s a powerful connection between the words we use and the actions we take.
Five spice pork belly taco $5
I started with a base of Very Vanilla, layered with White (edge pierced) and topped with some new Kimberly Polson Paper (Fiskars). The long rectangle at the top is the flipside of the same paper, matted in white and then again on Very Vanilla and scalloped the bottom edge (SU punch) and added some white Kaiser pearls to the corner. The main image is from SU's 'Always' set, stamped in Versamark and embossed in white EP on VV card, matted on white and pierced the edges. The flower is made up of three white Kaiser flowers, layered and a pearl brad from Little Yellow Bicycle was added to the centre. Finally I added the sentiment, which is actually a sticker from the co-ordinating Kimberly Polson range. I don't normally 'do' stickers, but I liked these. :)
If so, I didn’t hear it, and I drove all night
1st step
Well, that's it for today. I am posting Billy in the following challenges:
The first thing I'll do when the zombies turn up is to get bitten so I can become one.
Law enforcement agencies are not free from allegations and scandals either. Numerous reports have been heard about the gradual success of police forces in securing parts of Lyari but many have been found to be an exaggeration. The efficacy of the police forces is questionable when about 15000 forces are deployed to take down only few hundred criminals. If gangsters are being caught and killed, the level of violence has not assuaged and neither has the public been given any proof of the convicted or killed criminals. There are rumors which claim the police has joined forces with Arshad Pappu’s gang to take down members of the Amn Committee. At the same time, the weapons confiscated by the police are said to have vanished implying some underground deal. Many cases of corrupt actions have been heard against Chaudhry Aslam, the face of the law enforcement forces in Lyari. Some believe he yields more power than IG Sindh.
I am currently incredibly stressed out by a multitude of things going on my life. Not all of them are work related, but some of them are. And it's because of this I find it so upsetting when people are all, "You don't even care!" Because I care very much. Too much in fact, and it's probably this excessive amount of caring that is ruining my life.
Here's some pics!!
"What's your location?" asked Siri.
As in not on the premises so there absolutely was no laborer but me? I realize my yard will never look like a magazine ad but I was hoping to maybe get enough mulch out to keep the moisture from evaporating around the bushes. Hours later I came in to get cleaned up thinking I would join friends and festivities at the local Irishman's Pub. As I was toweling my hair dry I turned on the tv and realized they were calling "Jockeys up!". No way could I get hair, make-up, clothing and driving to the pub done in a few minutes. So I went to fetch a beverage and watch the race thinking I would still meet up with friends for the Cinco celebrations.
Well, I'm happy to report that we had a lovely time. He's an interesting kid--quirky and awkwardly sweet. It was good to spend some quality time with him. And he and his girlfriend seemed smitten with The Geej. Of course.
I'm really itching for a new blog design. If you have recommendations of companies, I'd love to hear them!
Jenni’s words remind me of one of my all-time favorite stories. It was a big Special Olympics race, and the disabled athletes had trained for months. Their coaches and families were all on the sidelines, cheering them on. The starting gun went off and the runners sprinted away from the gate, but suddenly one runner tripped and fell to the ground. The crowd gasped in dismay and the other runners looked back to see what had happened. As the crowd exhorted them to keep on running, each of the runners stopped, turned around, and walked back to help the fallen runner get to his feet and hug him in consolation.
12. Kill The Prophet - Filibuster
Fluff the couscous with a fork. Add the almonds, chickpeas, bell pepper, olives, lemon juice, parsley and the remaining 1/4 cup olive oil to the couscous. Toss gently to combine. Taste, adjust the seasonings with salt and pepper, and serve immediately. Serves 4
In high school he continued to be on the outskirts of social acceptance, but luckily in high school the torment seems to die down and I think in the larger school he found some kindred souls and things probably weren't so bad for him. But he and I were never really friends.
Apart from learning that too much of a hop can kill off a beer's best features, I was very interested in the demonstration of the yawning gap between IBUs and perceived bitterness. Though these were all, on paper, as bitter as each other, the difference in taste between Bramling X and Sorachi Ace was remarkable. Were I asked to guess their IBUs I'd have been saying 90 and 65 respectively. Bittering units aren't a metric I pay much attention to when compiling a beer recipe and I feel somewhat justified now in doing that.
It was a hard decision to pick out which kit was my favourite, but I managed to narrow it down and eventually chose 'Tree of Blossoms' by Van Gogh, the blue sky and blossom filled tree remind me that spring is just about here.
However, it made me realise that I had always harboured the desire to be called something else. I have been quietly aching to be called a loose cannon. Just once, by one person, on one occasion. Compared to loose cannon, being called a stalwart was like being told you are nice, as opposed to be told you are cool. I hadn't realised how long I had been carrying around this loose cannon thing until shortly after The Double Stalwart Incident. Why had no one ever told me I was a loose cannon?
Brace yourself; this is going to be good.
I discovered Ja the debater during my first year in Miriam College High School. Back then, I didn’t want to join the debate club. I actually became a debater by accident. When the debate club, which was called the Forensics Guild, promoted in my class, all my friends wanted to join. I didn’t. I even said to my friend “Marian, yang debate-debate na yan, hinding-hindi ako sasali.” I thought debate was boring that’s why I didn’t give in to peer pressure.
A Taste of Ecstasy
We've been up to a whole lot of nothing here at Elizabeth Hill. Our break was so great! Especially New Year's Eve when we stayed home and made sushi and played games. Zuddy bought Yahtzee and I've never played it until now!! I'm hooked and we've been playing a lot.
What a great and amazing God we serve. We sin and we rebel against Him and we reject Him and yet He still stands ready to forgive us, ready to deliver us, ready to help us and ready to heal us if we will just turn to Him and call upon Him. Oh that we would praise the Lord for His goodness!
4 cups confectioners' sugar
We left the campus a couple of hours later in the Camaro my parents bought me listening to some radio show talk about the scores of strange objects that had been spotted in the skies all over the world. I remember looking over at Sheri and joking about how aliens always pick inbreed rednecks to have close encounters with, she laughed while looking at me adoringly and I felt like the king of the world.
Glen wants to complete the canvassing of a very densely populated area.
sometimes we as scrapbookers create a page we really love
“Some people think the more unrealistic elements of the plot, such as fantastical characters like Colin Rosensteil or George Owers will be hard to realistically bring to the screen, but a combination of extensive computer graphics work and naked pictures of Carina O’Reilly mean I’m confident I can even make them look socially normal.”
Nap was resistant of the idea of going to Valencia. Beaches are so silly and pointless, after all, unless you are storming them. But we found this massive sand castle built just to Nap’s size. He reconsidered his previous thoughts on beaches.
"We want to know how we are going to be protected. What is going to happen when the police reinforcements return to Cape Town? Are more businesses going to be burnt to the ground before the Pops return?”
Cameron tough guy all around. He is a racer, a lover of women and has traveled all around Europe but now he has to come home to see his father in a coma. As he passes away he is there with his two brothers and a little boy. Cameron has to make a home for Seth, a ten year old, that is being rumored to be his father’s real child. But those are rumors and Cameron wants them gone. With the help of his brothers they will find a way to help Seth.
I had my own letter.
Happy Halloween to all!
fading.
When you consider that our state legislature had a bill advance through committees allowing the bullying of gays as long as it was done in the name of religious objections to that lifestyle, you can see why someone like School Board member Van Shaver would feel a criminal investigation into this matter is warranted. Keeping gay kids sequestered in that proverbial closet is important to people like Shaver, because it probably makes him feel all icky to think about what goes on in there.
Indeed, we might ask here: what do we want from climate change? What world do we secretly hope climate change will create—and what details of this world can we glimpse in today's speculative descriptions of the future? What explicit moral lessons do we hope climate change will teach our fellow human beings?
After all, I am following the most unpopular person in history.
The pics weren't added until a couple months later as I had a hard time finding something that worked. The pics were $10 each from Kitchen Stuff Plus and weighed next to nothing so the pics are actually hanging with push pins.
1 apple (I used Granny Smith), diced
Who is your favourite recurring crime fiction hero/detective?
Nimbash was coming up quickly and there was plenty of work to be done. I quickly became swept up in the flow of work that came with planning an event of this magnitude. I ended up working on a lot of different things, and although it wasn’t necessarily my “job description”, I felt I got more of the valuable experience that I needed in simply working with a business than the kind of stuff I was already learning in college. I picked up lunch for the weekly planning meetings and sat in on them, I fielded phone calls so that the other staff could get some work done, I called businesses to ask them if they would be willing to donate their time or product for the different exhibits we would have at Nimbash, I typed up artist biographies, became the contact on campus for artists to submit to, and answered questions on the Twitter page about the event. Although I had enjoyed the first half of my internship, I enjoyed the second half even more. I felt like I got to know the Nimbus staff well, and each of them were kind, caring, and wonderful people to work with. I felt that I learned a lot and gained valuable experience and contacts that no one can dispute.
1. Slow Shutter Speed. This is up to you and your tastes. If you want to “freeze-frame” the spray, the specific waves, the droplets of water, you want a really fast shutter speed. Once in a while, I like this to capture the power or drama of the falls.
running your palm softly
Stuckey's citation of affordable housing again signaled the developer’s new emphasis on providing housing as opposed to jobs, since the job projections have been cut significantly. (Of the projected 6860 apartments, 2250 would be designated as affordable for low-, moderate-, and middle-income people, and subsidized through tax-exempt city and state bonds.)
i included the martha photo above b/c i think i'll be using the bottom cakestand on the left. my grandmother has an identical one although it has a hairline crack that runs the width of it ... so i'm a little concerned about that. anyone know of any ways to reinforce things like that?
Alright, folks, here it is. The pattern for the much displayed Barnyard Gang pattern. I have some more pictures to share with you concerning this particular bag and characters. I gave it to my cousins baby boy Toby and he enjoyed them. But, that is for another post. Now, it is pattern time!
It wasn’t a particularly difficult session. But it wasn’t a particularly easy one either. There were a couple of issues I struggled to articulate well, like the fact that I have never been able to tell Her to Her face that something She’s doing irritates me (She should notice I’m irritated and then examine why that might be – it’s what I do) and I’m not sure how it felt to get those things out. Not good, that’s for sure.
A huge thank you to all that played along in our "Doilies" challenge, it was fun seeing all the great ideas out there! A big thank you also for our generous sponsor My Grafico!!
Things start to get blurry at this point. I remember snippets of the night. I remember walking around to three or four more bars (continuing to get double shots at each). I remember sitting by the pool for a while chatting. I remember laying out on the deck chairs (even though it was well past dark and probably chilly) talking and getting all drunk emotional. I remember dad making me walk a straight line and being shocked at how well I did it (I have no idea how I did this; he was probably too shit-faced himself to really see me.)
As well as being vice-principal, I am the counsellor and an LST teacher. A few years ago, when I was a full time elementary school counsellor, I worked with an administrator who was moving to a new school at the end of the year. We were having a conversation about what the school would look like the following year. She had been there for quite some time and had supported many initiatives. She said it was time to see if the work she had done would “stick” when she had left. She explained that it was like the art project in which you put glue on paper and then sprinkle glitter over it. Now was her time to see what work (the glitter she had applied) was going to stay after she left. This metaphor has always stayed with me. I think about it when I reflect on the work we do and the impact we are making in students’ lives.
Boots: White Mountain, gift
Beyond the ceremony
Wow and I mean WOW! This ale was a big surprise. Big malty character on the nose with a bit of caramel thrown in too. The mouth full is where the awesome Hazelnuttyness hits you wonderfully smooth going down and satisfying. I get abit funny about brewers adding stuff to beers...BUT this is done right in true Rogue Brewery fashion- these guys really know what they are doing. Had this over at the Innspire Craft Beer Merchants tent- a great bunch of guys who bring in some incredible beers from around the world. Check out their ute/pickup below.
secrets, like lint and scattered change.
Novels are not real life. They have plots – a lot of them do anyway – and tie things up neatly at the end. The characters express themselves succinctly, stay on topic and don’t go “er” and “um” all the time. Huge chunks of time when nothing interesting is happening just vanish. And behaviour gets simplified, streamlined: good people do good things and bad people do bad things. What makes a character stand out is where they surprise us.
The great torpedoes I prepare
After what has felt like months, this move back to the island is pretty much officially over. It only took four month to finally get all this dam furniture to the north but it's finally here. Three more pods full of random "Useless" crap came in last week. And with that, we started yet another Pod Party. That being calling all the friends I could and making them move everything from the pods to the basement with payment being pizza. It would have been a quick and easy job, but of course as with everything with this move, there was a problem. Apparently even though my mother claimed that she threw out most of what was left in the house at North Carolina, we still had way too much stuff.
05. Vai Vedrai
These incredible posters were created by the student organization at Ohio University called Students Teaching Against Racism (STARS). Amazingly, these posters became popular over Tumblr on their president’s blog site (here). Their mission is “to educate and facilitate discussion about racism and to promote racial harmony and to create a safe, non-threatening environment to allow participants to feel comfortable to express their feelings.”
Please don’t misunderstand me… I LOVE cuddles. But when it comes to sleep time, I can’t sleep with someone touching me. (Can someone please explain to me why “Health,” “Sleep Disorders,” and “Conditions and Diseases” just appeared as “recommended tags” for this post…. Is not wanting cuddles a disease!?). I’m more than happy to cuddle a guy if I’m watching a movie, or when we are in bed talking pre or post sex… But once it’s sleep time, just stop touching me.
has decided that Bitter American is selling so well that it will hold up as a year-round beer.Here's 21st Amendment Brewery co-founder Nico Freccia: "We got so many emails and tweets asking us to make this a year-round beer, we just couldn't ignore them. It's the perfect antidote to the big beers of winter and
Dan and I went to the play last year and absolutely LOVED it! It's a story of love and faith amidst a pioneer family's journey West. The musical has me near at tears every time we go. There is a live band playing all the music behind the screen of the play so you can actually see them playing as the actors and actresses are singing. Also, there is a choir behind us who sing along as well. The performers dance up and down the isles too. All of this combined with the lovely story brings the spirit so strongly to my heart. My testimony of the gospel is always strengthened each time we go. I love it!
A lovely country inn, with great food and lovely scenery from the beer garden. After a few beers and a tasty meal, it was off to bed ready for the climb the next day.
I say 1947 because some of the songs date from then, including Dennis' own "Natch," a Merceresque tune that I would swear Mercer himself recorded, although I can't find any evidence of such.
Stood mesmerized reaching out in a silent stance
Stir again
But then your next message is equally strong.
Out of honesty I finally decided to tell my boss. I was on a temporary contract, which meant she could fire me if she didn’t like me.
I was planning our dinner for Saturday and I'd settled on veal chops for me and Jeff and a beet and goat cheese salad with candied walnuts and arugula. But I needed a starch. A nice butternut squash caught my eye and I decided to try to make butternut squash risotto. And maybe, just maybe, wee one would partake. I mean it's rice, it's orange, and I was going to add parmesan cheese.
What’s the point??? It just doesn’t last!
When she said she could not love
he squeezed my shoulder and laughed.
Said Kelly, grinning.
Since taking over the presidency of Johor FA early this year, Tunku Ismail has appointed former Singapore in­­ternational Fandi Ahmad as the team manager and technical advisor.
Cauliflower is a cool season crop that maintains the best flavor and eye appeal if temps stay below 70F and it receives even moisture throughout the growing period. Cauliflower can be started indoors 6 weeks before the average last spring frost and transplanted into a prepared garden as much as two weeks before the last frost. It can also be planted as part of a fall garden if started about 75 days before the average first fall frost. Plant in full sun about 18 inches apart and maintain about 1inch of water per week. Once the flower head begins to develop, loosely gather the leaves surrounding the head and tie them together with a rubber band or twist tie. This is called 'blanching'. Blanching protects the flower head from expose to the sun, keeping the head snowy white and helping to maintain flavor. The head is fully mature when it reaches about 6 inches in diameter. Use a sharp knife to cut it off the plant about 2 inches below the head and store it in the refrigerator for up to two weeks.
Christina is my BFF, we have been friends since the first grade! Now we both have little boys that we are hoping will remain friends for life! Christina's Blog follows her family's Journey of adoption , parenting and lots of random fun!
Instead I perched my favorite bench (covered in David Hicks La Fiorentina) under it and filled it with pillows that complemented the art but didn't feature the strong pink element. Mixing patterns here wasn't an easy task. I didn't want to use geometrics as I felt that would detract from the bench. I lucked out when I found silk and velvet ikat scraps. Ikats are abstract enough that they go with just about everything. When mixing, make sure you vary the size,
She was no longer smiling, with a thin river of blood trickling down her swollen lip to drip from her chin. Her lips curled into the snarl of a wild animal and she launched herself at him, fang and claw. Her wide eyes rolled and she fought like one possessed, arms flailing, teeth champing. The captain suffered for it, and red slashes appeared on each cheek, but Sharia could not bring his armored bulk down and he finally let go his stuck sword to aim a blow at her face that sent her sprawling backwards, eyes blurring and nose exploding in bloody pain. With a sickening crunch, the back of Sharia’s head struck the hard stone belt buckle of the Hero of Peace.
With Massey is the shady Dr. Einstein, played with aplomb by the very face of shady supporting characters, Peter Lorre himself. Josephine Hull and jean Adair play Mortimer's two aunts, who at first glance seem like two harmless old biddies, but are soon discovered to be a couple of delusional Kevorkians, poisoning elderly lodgers in their bed and breakfast and burying them in the basement. And then there's John Alexander as Teddy Brewster, Mortimer's other brother, who believes himself to be none other than Teddy Roosevelt. Even the always-terrific Edward Everett Horton shows up as the proprietor of the funny farm wherein Mortimer seeks to commit his murderous aunties.
The shoes and my nail polish helped me add some color to the outfit. I’m usually very matchy matchy but today I broke that pattern! I’m proud! I bought my first red lipstick today! I don’t know when I’m going to try it out, but that is a huge step for me. Make up can change the vibe of an outfit. For example, two people can have on the same black outfit. Depending on the makeup (eye shadow, eye liner, blush, lipstick, etc.) , one could look elegant and the other could look goth.
Back soon!
10. Love. To receive love is to have given love. Love begins with kindness, a choice. Take out your neighbors garbage. Mow their lawn. Invite them over for dinner. Kiss your spouse when you wake up in the morning. Change a dirty diaper. Hire a maid as a surprise, or clean the house yourself. Choose to respond with empathy when you have none. Say the hard word when it matters and you must. Take your children out on dates. Surprise your parents with a visit. Come home early from work. If someone notices something of yours they think is special or amazing or of note, give it to them. Listen to the stories of others. Ask questions about someone else’ life. And of course, though often missed, have compassion on yourself. All love of God and neighbor flows from a love of self.
What is my favorite drink?
Process Archival
Tokens- (Use these tokens or make your own.) Print several copies of the token cards on card stock. Cut out token cards. Laminate or cover with clear contact paper to make them last.
Magic Bus
TRACK LISTING --
This spring, discover how you can put your child on the path to success with K¹², America’s K–12 online education leader.
That's my Dad, Jim, circa Christmas 1983. He was rockin' my barrettes and flashing one of his "village idiot grins" as Mom called them. He was a funny guy.
Let Me Travel Along--Same.
One day I got bored and saw it at dramacrazy. I gave it a shot and it was uber good, definitely so much better than I expected. I even liked the 70′s part which was the introduction. I liked the color and mood of the scenery, it was lushing in green. I liked Yoon Hee’s (Im Yoona’s 70′s character) clothes which are very cute at the same time reserved. Within a couple of days I finished up to the 10th episode so now I’m stuck with the agony of waiting for the weekly broadcast. I just watched episode 11 technically yesterday and I can’t wait for the 12th episode to be subbed.
Extreme Rules always delivers, possibly because they take the ‘extreme’ mantra seriously, and really push the boat out in terms of innovation and bodily sacrifice. Another plus point is that it coming off WrestleMania, it often provides the definite, concrete end points of quite a few feuds, which adds a a certain satisfaction to the event. All the matches here were entertaining, and at least acceptable in quality; some were very good, and the three headline matches – the most important ones – were exceptional, with the two title matches providing Match of the Year candidates. Another excellent Extreme Rules, and another excellent WWE PPV, which have been of a very high standard for the most part for a long time.
Seeing as I wrote about ANZAC biscuits the other day, I thought I ought to continue the New Zealand theme and write about the latest disaster to hit New Zealand: the marmite famine.
The Nikibiki tanks are nice and long. They cover my post partum pudge (does it still count as post partum when my youngest is a toddler?), and keep my butt covered even when I bend down or squat on the floor to be at the kids' level.
A couple of weeks ago we celebrated our first year...hard to believe how fast a year
After having breakfast next to the creek, we packed up our gear and hit the trail. We took the Bright Angel trail out, which is longer than the Kaibab – over 9.5 miles (probably over 10 when you include our walk from the cabins to the official trail head) but less steep, so generally thought to be easier for the uphill journey. It also has more water along the way than the Kaibab – essential for a canyon hike, where the rangers recommend each person drink at least 2 liters on the way down and 2-3 on the way back up.
I got this recipe from a church friend. These are sooo good. I first thought they wouldn't be, but oh man, was I wrong. Soft, moist, flavorful but not overwhelming. I crave this weekly... they. are. amazing.
every quirk of asphalt, tarmac, macadam
So yeah! The older generation likes to gripe about how sheltered our generation is, and how we never had the chance to go through what they went through - grueling hard work and all, or how the future of Singapore is screwed because some of us have started supporting the opposition.
So what are rules? One of the dictionary definitions is 'the customary or normal circumstances, occurrences, manner, practise, quality etc' Essentially we go through life following these types of rules, work hard at school, work hard at university, find a good job, be loyal & work hard at work, working hard is a somewhat recurring theme.
Well . . . Scott (my husband and Bluefield Acres partner) is an aspiring bladesmith. He forges beautiful, high-performance knives out of carbon steel. He is a certified arborist by trade, but wants to bladesmith full-time. He desires this to satisfy his inner artisan, but also so he can work at home and tend to the farm. Scott currently works in an urban area about an hour from home, and the garden suffers in his absence. While I do well with animals, I do not speak plant. With Scott at home bladesmithing, our garden and orchard will flourish, but there's a hitch - the knives must sell, and for that we turn to the ABS.
Ha! Can you tell I've been practising my guitar? I can play 'Leaving on a Jet Plane' AND 'Streets of London' now you know. Simon Cowell is going to be knocking on my door any day, you wait. (And telling me to stick to the day job, no doubt...)
X. Reflections on Habeas Corpus, the Bill of Rights, and the Constitution (contemplated)
Christopher Anderson’s “Son” is indeed a love poem to his wife, Marion Durand (a photo editor at Newsweek); their 3-year-old son, Atlas; and Mr. Anderson’s father, Lynn.
Scarves are the wunderkind of the accessory world. You can use them to tie back your hair, dress up your bag, tie them around your neck to add some color to your outfit, belt your skirt or pants with them. They are hands down my favorite!
Joan Francis
I am a housewife who has started substitute teaching at a middle school. I am having a hard time figuring out what to wear. Compared to the other teachers I am very young, and the students have already noticed this (and the older boys think they can flirt with me). What can I wear that is fun and interesting (befitting my personality and my youth), but still modest and something that will help me be taken seriously?
He was made joint chairman of the Conservative Party with the Muslim peer Sayeeda Warsi after the 2010 election. Since then he has emerged as one of the key players in Cameron’s inner circle of advisers.
"How long has that one been there?"
Close girlfriends and my fiancé, and my brother who is also an MD physician. (My closest girlfriend at the time abandoned me during the treatment after a 10 year friendship. I don’t know why either, that was another reason to be sad). My fiancé kept me sociable and laughing so I couldn’t crawl into a hole. I still found the hole at times, though, when I was alone and just needed to cry a little to let off stress.
We come in the age's most uncertain hours
We can just turn on the computer, and fire up a blog
The muses Clio, Euterpe and Thalia, by Eustache Le Sueur
Today is one of my favorite holidays. I found it more enjoyable once my son saw the fireworks for the first time. Kids always make things better. =) Happy 4th of July!
-Quiche Out
Let's take the key of C again as an example, looking at the illustration above, you will notice that note I on the key of C is C, note IV is F and note V is G.
At the going down of the sun and in the morning
Throughout my limited time with this pen, I experienced nothing but clean, even lines. The distribution of ink on the paper was perfect. I never experienced skipping, white spots, scratchiness, or any remotely undesirable performance. The nib was flawless, and the fine point was exactly what I'd expect out of a Western fine point.
Under the Mistletoe ... LMN ... 2 AM
Reich: People don’t trust a government that
3) Google Chrome (alas, I couldn't find a link to this one, so you'll just have to take my word for it)
Ironically, the governments targeted by Gulf Arab States are by far better than them despite these governments are well below the accepted local and universal standards.
Interestingly enough, although many people shut down and keep it all inside, his family chose to celebrate the time they did have with her by sharing stories, reconnecting with distant family (aka us) and breaking bread together. They talked about the good times, her funny quirks and how we will never forget her.
Yet all the lads they smile on me,
Sapporo 4.3%
Narrow passages
Reading this “Adventures of a Heroine” fantasy story, the memories of the Iraqi mothers I have held, their tears mingling with mine, or dampening my shoulder, as they watched helplessly as their children faded away in front of us, for want of medications, denied by Albright’s country and the UN she served, flooded back.
If you're an agency network big cheese, it's because you bought the smart agency, and then squeezed every last drop of profit out of it until it was incapable of doing anything but the same kind of shit as the rest of your network.
‘Cause the flag still stands for freedom
Anyway, so far, I've only been able to leave voicemails that I'd like to make payment arrangements, so I've yet to talk to an actual person, but I'm dreading it. I understand that they provided a service for which they should be paid...for which we WANT to pay them....but seriously, you can't squeeze blood out of a turnip. I can commit to making a payment each month...but I'm guessing that I won't be able to commit to paying what they want me to pay (since they say in huge letters on the bill that payment in full is due within 30 days), and I'm kind of dreading that conversation.
so if you wanna play along then head on over to scrapbook challenges and look for all the march madness going on. you could play along and win a fabulous prize - or you could just head on over and give my layout a vote if you wanna! OR just become a member and join in the fun. well there you have it and so this is my layout...
Any good thing to make us all merry.
"I know where we should go", I suddenly squealed, getting all excited at the thought of my impending suggestion. "The Ivy". My London friend laughed again. "You will never get into the Ivy at his short notice - they are booked for months in advance.
And my idol of control is even bigger than my ability to get bored, so I resist the Author's twists on my life story. I simmer in anxiety and drown those around me with it. I scorn the brokenness of it all without noticing the Carpenter is really wanting to reform my heart. Carve away the ugliness I crudely patched on myself. Repurpose it.
The company was magnificent, the view of the game spectacular and the food and lager was very much appreciated.
I always focus on the language – the language of Islam. The language of Islam is a negative, dead language, replete with violence, anger, hatred, and racism. Man is the product of language, the outcome of the negative and positive language to which he is exposed in this lifetime. If his life is dominated by negative language, he will emerge as a negative, reckless, and non-productive person, who rejects everything. On the other hand, if positive language dominates his life, he will emerge as a positive, happy, and productive person. This is why the negative language of Islam has failed. It has failed to produce people with a spontaneous and positive outlook. It has produced negative people. If we take a look at Islamic societies, we see what that negative man did.
1 philanthropic
And you, my dear readers, are in for a rare treat. I have a signed copy of Embassytown for giveaway, along with a set of the postcards with the beautiful artwork of all nine books. To be in with a chance, send an email to magemanda AT gmail DOT com with EMBASSYTOWN as the subject line. Include your mailing address to which the prize should be sent. I will open this up worldwide because I'm feeling generous after such a lovely evening *grin* This competition will run until next Tuesday, at which point I will announce the winner.
June 24 (Reuters) – Canadian police said on Thursday they had pulled over a car containing “dangerous materials” near the site where an international summit will be held in Toronto this weekend.
There appear to be two popular views on Hall's output. The first is that the woman was dire, couldn't sing or perform very well, and wasted her life pursuing a ridiculous fantasy. The second is that actually some of her output is pretty good with superb production values and some of the best session musicians available (The Wrecking Crew were known to be involved with some Dora Hall sessions). I freely confess I haven't heard enough of Hall's material to sensibly comment on her output overall, but I have heard the supposedly good tracks, and they are indeed of a far higher quality than the scoffers and sneerers would lead you to believe.
Eventually the two bodies will reach thermal equilibrium. Basically this means that the difference between temperatures of the bodies is about equal and remains steady. This is mostly a theoretical concept since there will generally be another source of heat around you to transfer its heat to you (the sun, other people, a stove, a sauna, or an erupting volcano).
· Watch how things in nature rely on each other…like when bees pollinate a flower.
He knew it would be impossible while Kṛṣṇa remained nearby, so he waited and waited for Hari to depart. He saw an ideal opportunity the moment Kṛṣṇa began to leave – for all the Pāṇḍava men and their unborn child were together in the same place. In a passionate haste this despicable wretch again sent forth the ultimate weapon in an uncontrolled blast.
Glenn Patrick Gaines was the oldest of two brothers. He was born in Boston, Massachusetts on June 19, 1970. His brother and both parents were killed in a plane crash in 1993, leaving him with no surviving family except for a few distant cousins he had never met. He and Jill met at an art exhibition shortly after that. Jill was the only surviving member of her family too, so they shared an immediate connection - they both understood what it was like to feel completely alone in the world. Their relationship grew and blossomed quickly, and I knew as soon as I met Glenn that he was the one for her. Jill and I often joked about how I knew it before either of them did, but I always said I could see it in their eyes. The way they looked at each other told me everything I needed to know.
The following excerpts are from an interview with Malika Zarrar, an Egyptian expert on Islamic law, which aired on Al-Faraeen TV on April 16, 2010.
You, it appeared, had your own special drummer.
However, our historical researches show that Entri was registered as a Director and 70% shareholder up until 12/10/05 at which point he handed his shares and directorship to Austin Chamitt Bugatt. Mr Bugatt is believed to be a retired civil servant in SALCRA and so his ability to buy into such a thriving construction concern is rather mystifying.
The violet wish didn't come true until much, much later. When I bought the house I live in now, three things sold it for me: the laundry room, the claw foot tub and the huge backyard. And, in that backyard, were violets. Hundreds of them. Over the years, I've protected them from the lawn care guys (because, unlike violets, creeping charlie deserves to die a poisoned death), lovingly relocated the ones in the way of the expansion of my garden, nibbled at their syrupy sweet flowers. Yes, violets are edible. In the language of flower, violets stand for faithfulness (blue) and "let's take a chance on happiness" (white). Knowing this, Mom and I sugared some blossoms from my yard and added them to the little white petit fours we served at my wedding. The chance I took on happiness on my wedding day didn't yield the desired result, but I'll always remember those precious little white cakes with their sparkling violets on top, all prettily lined up on trays.
xx ThoughtsWthDots xx
Noyola DE, Demmler GJ, Williamson WD, Griesser C, Sellers S, Llorente A, Littman T, Williams S, Jarrett L, Yow MD. Cytomegalovirus urinary excretion and long term outcome in children with congenital cytomegalovirus infection. Congenital CMV Longitudinal Study Group. Pediatr Infect Dis J 2000; 19: 505-510.
Fortunately I was awake enough to realize it was a scam of the spoofed address sort.
Actually, it’s not really the skiing I want to talk about; it’s something else altogether, a storm in a fondue. We spent one day at the nearby resort of Val Thorens. It was here that Aidan Burley, a Conservative Member of Parliament, attended a Nazi-themed stag party last month in the excellent ( I know: I've been!) Restaurant La Fondue in the centre of town.
It’s like being pulled under, drowning
Jaela - I don't know
Christ is in me! Amen!
“Well do it, now.”
I’m starting to think our kitchen has more inventory than Williams-Sonoma as we find ourselves wading in gadgets and service pieces. It’s the one room that works overtime in our home, so things must have their place. I’m a big fan of open shelving, where things are both accessible and visible. It’s important to arrange them for function, but it also means they become display pieces, and it can be tricky to pull this off without looking cluttered.
What is it with pop-up shops now?! Remember when they were sooo cool? Remember when they were this brilliantly elusive and exclusive enigma that the trendiest brands used and only the chosen few knew about or stumbled upon, only for it to disappear before they could even tell their friends? Well, several years down the track the pop-up shop has gone viral. It's in the mainstream, and it seems to be a bit pointless to bother with a pop-up when you advertise it everywhere, and you've got plenty of stores anyway, where people know they can go whenever they want to, not just when you say. This week is particularly crammed with pop-ups. Last Sunday I went to Spitalfields and took in not less than three pop-up shops within a city block of one another. And this weekend Whiteley's, a random shopping centre around the corner from my friends' place in Bayswater that I've never bothered to visit because it seems to have only a H&M, is having a whole floor dedicated to pop-ups (isn't that a department store?). Okay, I may go along to check out the Wild Fox boutique, but I will participate in frequent eye-rolling and make sure to think I am better than everyone there because I knew about pop-ups when they were still cool.
writing in my notebook
Like antecedent Mario Kart games, Mario Kart DS appearance a bulk of single-player admirable prix competitions that comprise four contest each. Mario Kart DS includes a complete of eight admirable prix competitions for a complete of 32 altered races, abounding of which aren’t attainable until you exhausted those that you can baddest from the outset. Four of the admirable prix (or 16 of the races, in added words) are all-new, while the absolute four are composed in actuality of archetypal circuits taken from the SNES, N64, GameCube, and GBA iterations of Mario Kart. The advance awning aggregate from simplistic figure-eight circuits and bank courses to artery contest that assignment you with alienated cartage and antagonism about a behemothic pinball table. Admirable Prix competitions can be contested in 50cc, 100cc, and 150cc classes, and as you advance through them you’ll apprehension an admission not abandoned in speed, but aswell in the assailment of your opponents.
Ron: Yeah, but you can read books on it and it’s got an onscreen keyboard and….
The event reached more than 13,000 people in its second year. Whilst on the face of it this was successful some of the process had been difficult with some events cancelled last minute. Some of the cities participating felt that it needed more funding to be successful and decided to refocus their efforts on their own individual objectives. In 2010 Leeds Media took the lead on the project and re-branded it to become Leeds Digital Festival. However many in the industry were unhappy with the aims of the festival and felt that it was out of touch with the true Leeds digital scene.
This morning I was responding to a late-night note from an unschooling dad, and wrote some things I thought sounded quite bloggish, so I lifted these parts, knowing I had photos to go with them. (No photo for the first paragraph, which is best for us all.)
(Suggestion list will be posted at the start of the event.)
We are back from Minnesota with not one, but TWO First Place Titles for my girls dance team and their two teams took 2nd and 3rd in the National Grand Championships for their entire bracket of all Senior teams. It was a great weekend in Minnesota, they laughed, they played, they worked hard and they danced their hearts out. Plus a bonus was the wonderful time with their roomies.
I can’t wait to play Unchartered 3! I know, I know, what kind of nerd am I if I didn’t pre-order it last year. I’m the nerd on a budget, okay?
Pat: Tornado Siren is about a meteorologist who studies tornadoes, who meets up with a man who claims to have an odd, mystical connection to tornadoes. According to Ben, he’s been wandering the earth for centuries, from twister to twister. As a scientist, Victoria finds his claims completely unbelievable, but she sees something that shakes her certainty. She ends up walking across Kansas with him to find out if his story is true. In the process, they fall for each other. In terms of genre, I’d label it as a paranormal love story, though it’s also partly a road trip story and disaster novel.
Brenda -- Craving
Coffee Grinder - I got all excited because as you may recall my "husband" (and I use the term loosely after this happened) broke our coffee maker - which had a coffee grinder IN it...As such, I'm currently coffee-less...the embassy has issued a warden notice to let everyone know they are not to try to interact with me prior to 10 am...for safety reasons. The Warden notice specifies the Embassy is not responsible for any subsequent injuries for individuals who disregard the notice.
1 cup firmly packed dark brown sugar
So. The author of this book? Not the kind of guy I want to hang out with. He's made some public remarks that I do not think are okay. At all. (Google it if you want to know.) But I do think the book is amazing and creative and disturbing in a good way, and it got me into reading sci-fi when I was younger, so I'm still recommending it.
to be a light—
I typed in “Pottery Barn” in this example, and of course, I got tons of results. You can type in more specific searches too, but they don’t always yield that many results. This is unfortunately due to the way items are tagged when people upload them. Hopefully Polyvore will come up with a solution at some point.
The information in this interview has the potential to rock the world. If the story is true, it already has.
The protest rally was held in front of Karachi Press Club and a large number of Plates participated in it.
I will definitely enjoy it fully in the upcoming days – I will eat it with such pleasure – and it will only be me, me and me and no one else!
for protection for all the little creatures out there,
I just very recently spent the day cleaning out my baking cupboard from one mouse who was living the high life. I found, to my surprise, the bottom plastic of an 8 oz. tube of frosting chewed to bits and the entire contents, not only devoured, but, the inside completely licked clean. Talk about a last meal!
Now that I have been put right with God through faith, I have peace with God through our Lord Jesus Christ. He has brought me by faith into this experience of God’s grace, in which I now live. And so I boast of the hope I have of sharing God’s glory! I also boast of my troubles, because I know that troubles produces endurance, endurance brings God’s approval, and His approval creates hope. This hope does not disappoint me, for God has poured out His love into my heart by means of the Holy Spirit, who is God’s gift to me! Amen!
Ekstrand J. and R. Sankar (2009). Storage Disorders, in Lisak, R.P., D.D. Truong, W.M. Carroll, & R. Bhidayasiri (eds). International Neurology. A Clinical Approach, (pp. 600-608), Wiley-Blackwell: Oxford
Sick. Watching TV for days on end, sweating furiously but too bored to pull the covers off. Filthy feet. Filthy legs. Separated by a valley of cigarette ends. Stuffing our faces full of fatty, greasy foods. Shutters down. Apartment crawling with bugs. Toilet blocked. Sick. We were so fucking sick.
The theme for the launch party of Author’s new footwear collection was (no wonder) the roaring 20’s. Everything from the ragtime music to the staff geared up in classic flapper gowns and curly finger waves made me feel like I was part of Louise Brooks and Zelda Fitzgerald’s jazz age.
In The Soldier’s Wife, Trollope’s sixteenth novel, Alexa Riley is stuck. Her daughter from a previous marriage is living miserably at boarding school, her three year old twins are a constant challenge, and she has been offered a wonderful job that she absolutely cannot take. She is married to Dan, an Army major, and being married to an army major really means being married to the Army. The Army dictates where they live, the Army dictates when they move, and the Army dictates that she may never build a career for herself because it makes her life too unstable. Furthermore, Dan has just returned from a six month tour of Afghanistan, but emotionally, has not yet come home. Alexa loves her husband, but the Army has trapped her into a lonely and unfulfilling life.
You may recall a previous article of mine, in which I highlighted the case of a couple who felt aggrieved that they had been described as a 'black couple'. In fact the article I quoted stated that they were 'furious':
My other dog-charging story involves a large unchained pit bull that started charging toward me at several hundred yards... I nearly died on the spot. Nowhere to run, deer in the headlights, I just stood there. I said my Hail Marys and prepared to meet my maker, hoping it wasn't too painful.
For Example, Susie Jones is a mousy plain cubicle worker… Doesn’t talk much, has a few friends, but not a social butterfly… Would she be more apt to be someone more… seductive?
You're probably wondering what I made all day! There were about 12 things by the time we wrapped up around 10:30PM, but here are some shots of my favorite projects that day. I kept things CAS and colored a LOT with Tombow markers, using lots of SU! stamps. It was really fun being there and getting to use so many products that I don't own myself!
12. Rude World (Isolated Tracks Page / Plant)
The buck stops right here. (And it might as well, seeing as it’s not even worth much anymore.) You will work harder. You will succeed.
I’ve tried getting cute cups.
December 15, 2011 1:35 PM
My cursive was, and is to this day horrendous. I tried hard. my mom made me sit and write for hours but I simply could not turn those curves into anything resembling nice handwriting. Trust me when I say doctors are envious of my shaky penmanship. One a very nice teacher gave me a B in the last 6 weeks. She even said to me, "Travis you're handwriting has not improved one bit, but I know you work hard at it and you are so smart you deserved to be on the honor roll at least once."
A 3D Projection Mapping Claw Game done at Roosevelt Hotel, LA, California has not just succeeded in engaging hundreds of people but also made it to the Guinness Book of World Records as the world’s largest claw game ever!
The first type of owner I am going to discuss is probably the least common: I feel like I am apart of this group along with a few good friends of mine. These owners arent owners, they are parents. Their pets are their children. As a mom of human children, I take them to have their vaccines as required. As a mom of a 4 legged child, I take him to have his vaccines as required. I feed him, love him and treat him like he is my child. He lives indoors with us, he eats 2 meals a day. He plays outside an appropriate amount of time and he does not stay out in the rain or snow. Although he does have a very comfortable bed, he sometimes sleeps on my bed. Sometimes I think he acts like he dosent know what I'm saying when I tell him to move. I think he uses the "dog" thing to his advantage.
Why, doesn’t that sound like just the sort of thing snobby Victorian New Englanders would say! The right kind of people indeed! Next thing you know, we’ll be calling people “mudbloods” and looking down our noses at anyone without an Ivy League pedrigree. The outrage!
Colour - Amber/Red
The relationship between the BMI number and body fat is fairly strong; however the correlation varies by sex, race and age. Look forthese variations:
Oh, don’t get me wrong! I’d love to see Dr. Ron Paul take the nomination! I would love to eat my words if that happened. But nigh, this will not happen. Mitt Romney, a fellow Michiganite, will take the primary here in Michigan. He will go on to take the nomination. He is the establishment pick. Obama will go onto win the election in November.
Move on, for the orbit is fixed for your soul.
We’ve achieved so much here in the 64 years of independence and the pioneering decades that preceded them. And there were many occasions, over the years, when we may have had no choice but to sacrifice oversight and future planning because the immediate challenges were so acute. Sometimes, young Israel may have had to careen blindly round corners.
I really want to do the ship one because it reminds me of Norfolk which is where we are going in a few weeks time (as long as the blooming passports turn up!)...I also like the Blackbird Sampler as I love the song of Blackbirds. They remind me of my childhood and because we have had such a mild winter, we hear so many blackbirds now. They remind me it is great to be alive and after my health issues, it would be great to get my initials and those of my children on something which will keep my memory alive.
What the Mainstream Media Failed to Report on May Day
Ingredients for the filling.
Who are set on fire,
Lets look at South Africa
All these days I have been suffering from this awful eye infection due to excessive heat which I can't tolerate at all. Today I am feeling somewhat better.
This misestimate, it should be stressed, was not down to the BBC not understanding how many people were Doctor Who fans in the first place. Rather it was down to them misunderstanding the range of what Doctor Who fans were. They assumed, not unreasonably given the available data, that Doctor Who fans were just British Star Trek Fans. They weren’t. Star Trek had always been a cult show. But Doctor Who fandom was a motley of people who didn’t fit smoothly into any existing fan category - who, as Tat Wood put it, always assumed they were normal right up until their liking Doctor Who got used to mark them as culturally “other.”
For the first Dusk 2 Dawn blog train we thought we'd tackle Edward Lear's classic poem.
There's a bottle with a black label. Completely unreadable. Even Dan is turning it around trying to change the reflection, moving it slowly in the light. At the right angle you can make out some words. Mozart, no not Mozart, some musician's name, Schubert. Schubert's Theorem. Theorem?
I mean, cluster hops, really? Quick, aside from that novelty beer Double Mountain made with them last year, can anyone name me a single Portland beer that uses Cluster? Willamettes are not as vanishingly rare, but suffice it to say we've managed to get wind of some newer strains out here. (Partly by visiting the hop fields one hour south.)
I’m going to do my happy, positive “music” blog tomorrow – ran out of time today.
Roughly fifteen years ago, I was living with my sister and mother in my sister's house. After a year or so of this arrangement, I needed to find a place of my own. My full-time job had turned into a part-time job a couple of years earlier, so when my formerly-trusty Hyundai decided to breathe its last, I needed a cheap car, in a hurry, so I could search for an apartment.
187Now turn'd to Heav'n, I weep my past offence,
Amazon.com
It was right up there with one of the best days I’ve ever experienced with him because we were free to do whatever we wanted, at our leisure, and enjoy each others company. We strolled along on a tour hand in hand, and when people would look at us, we didn’t care, we just laughed. We drove for quite awhile, and it was relaxing to sit next to him in the car, my wedges off and my feet up on the dashboard, my left hand holding his right hand in my lap, driving on a gorgeous day with the windows open and my hair blowing in the wind, listening to music, laughing, talking, and just…being together.
So don't know if she committed a tp crime.
So, soon I'll post pictures of my new apartment, that I've spent that last couple of weeks working to get everything moved in and looking good...and much more will come from there.
There was a very old temple, well rather the ruins of a very old temple, in their village. Madan Ray, son-in-law of one of the twelve Bhuiyans, apparently built the temple before the days of the Mughals. Well no one from Madan Ray’s family were around. The temple was in ruins, with trees replacing the walls. But where the idol used to be, there a prayer still was held every Saturday, with village girls placing vermillion and flowers. There was no priest, but everyone used to say that no prayer in the ruin ever went unheard. That day after bath, Shankar went by the ruins to make a prayer.
Something about this is off. "Few" goes with countable nouns, such as dollars, but it doesn't seem to work in this sentence. It's almost as if the writer is suggesting he had 250 $1 bills and only a few were left.
We welcome this announcement (SEE BELOW).
links to the kitchen
Who am I to keep people on the hook, when I am the shameful, the broken, the afraid, the forgiven? I have to extend others the grace that was extended to me. Even if it means doing it over and over and over again.
Tsai Ming Liang’s pastiche juxtaposes images of carnality, superstition, ritual and the mundane: a trio of kitschy women sings onstage; an underage girl performs a striptease; long takes of an empty underpass and rotting carcasses of fish covered with flies; a shaman presumably ridding believers of bad spirits; and power lines against a cloudy sky. This film about a medium in a trance is likely to put the viewer into a stupor as well. The film’s more prosaic alternate title, “Fish, Tunnel”, more accurately describes this bad trip. (0/10)
Sadly, for me the beer was a near miss. As you can see from the picture, it was a bit murky, though the color was nice (to my color-blind eyes, anyway). When cold, the aroma was inhibited--faintly sour with a cherry/fruit note. As it warmed the nose opened up into a cellar-y lactic bouquet, more lambic than red as the fruit fades back.
We live in a time of NLPRS and MDIS systems, which are license plate and facial recognition softwares used in traffic cameras and cell phones, but you don’t know it. Cops do. Long Term Coverts do.
Ablaze entirely
I politely informed him otherwise.
This recipe makes 12 rather large tarts as I line muffin tins with the dough and generously fill each one. The traditional recipe uses corn syrup, but often I use maple syrup because I usually have some on hand. I'll also use raisins if I can't find dried currants which are harder to find in Dallas. Personally, I prefer the dried currants which are smaller.
Anyway, I'm easily annoyed this week, is my point. So the universe should take this post as an open letter to please try not to annoy me right now. It's just not nice.
I should quickly say that this is not a critique of Shimerians. It is only my experience.
This was not the first occasion for such practices of obliteration. After the Army swept out of their beachhead around Palaly in late 1995 and reconquered the western two-thirds of the Jaffna Peninsula, they bulldozed the existing tuyilam illam at Kopay and Vadamarachy. When the ceasefire period from late 2001 enabled the LTTE to restore these holy sites, they took care to build a little memento of smashed-up epitaphs in glass cases with plaques delineating this act of desecration (see Figures 3 and 4).[v]
Consider just one example. In 2002, Northwest Airlines was busted for trucking beer and wine to Detroit Metro Airport instead of acquiring it through a Michigan wholesaler. According to the Detroit Free Press, Northwest reported it was saving up to $3 million per year by shipping the alcohol to the Great Lakes state, rather than buying it locally.
I remember vividly the day I first heard this song. It was an early day in March 2008 in Henderson, Nevada. I was sitting in my maroon Mazda in the parking lot of Albertson’s with my radio on. The version I heard that afternoon was the instrumental one, and it seemed to encapsulate all I was feeling that day. I remember idling the car instead of driving home…and just being as I listened. Today was the first time I ever heard it with the words. I was happy to find this version.
and Funky skirt
From @skipbang
I combed through my cookbook collection for one or two recipes to try and found more variety than I’d expected. A few ingredients are common — egg, oil and a tart liquid (lemon juice or vinegar) that holds hands, so to speak, with the other two and brings them together. The recipes I looked through used proportions that varied wildly, though, from one egg with a half a cup of oil to one egg and two yolks with two cups of oil. The oil prescriptions differed, too. Mark Bittman’s How to Cook Everything recipe uses extra virgin olive oil, for example, which is exactly the oil type expressly forbidden by Shirley O. Corriher in Cookwise, an enthusiastic and readable treatise on the science behind recipes (which it also provides). (She warns that unrefined oil will cause the emulsion to separate after a day; it didn’t.) Some recipes call for dry mustard, some for sugar (confectioner’s sugar, in the 1973 edition of The Joy of Cooking), some for both. (The concept is that the powder enhances the emulsion). The techniques ranged from simply drizzling a trio of ingredients into a blender to a complicated, elbow-grease-heavy process of heating, cooling and beating.
Episodes:
As the middle aged woman learned all about parental love, and the shapes and sizes it comes in............
It happens to match the environmentalist movement happening right now. There are quest lines aimed at stopping a deforestation (of Ashenvale Forest). In The Burning Crusade, the Fel Reaver is a colossal enemy war machine portrayed as highly destructive. In general, many enemies are associated with trying to destroy the environment, and this is an idea that definitely rings in our current society.
Allow God to take the wheel and drive. Don’t rush things. Turn to Him in prayer for everything. Trusting Him to reveal His proper timing to this saint. It isn’t a very visible app, but it’s a challenge for myself to work on being still and listening for that small still voice of God’s. Of Him beckoning this saint forward at the proper time to bring about His will and to bring Him glory, of who is worthy of all praise and glory.”
Drinking fountain 1882
The hotel we stayed at was Marriott Copley Place Boston in the section of town known as the Back Bay. The Back Bay is a busy area of downtown Boston. Nearby landmarks include the Prudential Center, the Boston Public Library, and the John Hancock Tower.
Those little kindergarteners crawled in here in September and even though they don't know it, the changes I've seen in them happened quickly too.
By Sheila Corey, from the book “God Answers Moms’ Prayers”
Our car steamed through the chilled summer night, sliding in the grooves of the worn country road like new rain in some forgotten river bed. The encroaching weeds that threatened the road’s existence from both sides stood up and claimed their innocence as we rushed past the McMansion developments surrounding leaning, creaking farmhouses who refused to sell. The wind squeezed into our open windows, chilled our exposed faces and hummed hymns to the coming of fall.
I must say... it was REALLY good. Very. But you'd better have a brand new box of tissues sitting next to you, extra soft. I'm reading it for a book club and I got midway through when I texted a friend who is also in the book club.
Bitterly she weeps at night, tears running down her cheeks. Not one of all her lovers is there to comfort her. Her friends have all betrayed her; they have become her enemies.”
Swan-white of heart, a sphinx no mortal knows,
For more information, call (718) 622-1107.
And last but not least THREE gift certificates!
At first, I was shocked when I heard I had to go and report on a vandalised car park outside Coventry. I definitely didn’t see that coming. Also, I haven’t really been reporting outside the city centre so it was kinda of shock when I heard it but I said to myself – I will do whatever it takes and will not quit. People believe in me and won’t let them down!
A mother of a 17-year-old pupil told Beeld in an email that her daughter was hysterical when she phoned her mother and told her about the events.
The campaign itself was an icebreaker in the midst of tensions following the terrorist attacks of November 2008 in Mumbai. According to polls, conducted before the launch and a year later, Aman ki Asha improved Indians’ and Pakistanis’ perceptions about each other.
green and gold, hung with tassels and pendants, a rich girdle,
Over the years we have been hurt. We have had our hearts exposed to all of the elements, and over time….our little hearts have taken hit after hit and we just can not seem to take any more…. so….
Next Stop Seventh Avenue, Methodist Hospital
Some people are going to say that the true problem is that credit is tightening up to the point where it’s going to destroy the economy. While there is some veracity to that argument, don’t you think that’s masking another problem, that perhaps credit has been a little too easy? If you want to look for predatory lenders, how about credit card companies? Why have they been allowed to get away with the interest rates and practices that they have been utilizing for over 20 years?
The vibrations of love in the purest form are truly the frequency keys to your own and this planet’s transformation and ascension.
1 disagreed
We see fifteen years pass via historic moments on the television. One morning a woman comes into his room holding a bell, she says "You're by yourself. Right now, you're lying on a plane. When you hear the sound of the bell, turn your head and look down. Do you understand what I'm saying?" She rings the bell and continues "You will see an endless field of green grass. The sun is shining brightly and there's a cool breeze." We then see a red trunk in the middle of a field. The trunk opens and Dae Su gets out of it. The grass is on the roof of a building and the man we saw in the beginning being suspended by his tie is there holding a dog. Dae Su touches the man and dog as if to prove they're real. The man is shaken by this and asks him "You see, even though I'm worse than a beast, don't I have the right to live?" Dae Su repeats the man's question. We see that the man throw himself backward over the ledge, attempting suicide. Dae Su catches him by his tie and asks the man to delay his death to hear his story. The man remarks "That's awful" after hearing Dae Su's tale. He then asks Dae Su to hear his own story but Oh Dae Su leaves. We see the man fall from the roof onto a car as Dae Su walks out at ground level.
Carlos has been wanting to take us ever since the show started touring in the US around 4 years ago after the huge success of the tv show. Bear and I even bought him an official tour t-shirt from the treasure shop because it was the closest we thought we would ever get.
The entire process will usually take a couple of months.
In Chettinad food, the most important spices are marathi mokku (dried flower pods), anasipoo (star anise) and kalpasi (known as the "black stone flower", also known as dagad phool). In addition, whole red chillies and saunf ( fennel seed) are also used along with cinnamon,bay leaf,cloves,peppercorn ,cumin seeds and fenugreek .Aroma of this dish comes mainly from Mace,Star anise and Black stone flower …Lets get started with Marinating of Chicken followed by its cooking Process which would result in Tasty n Yummy dish .
2 restriction
First of all, I let my kids have at a piece of paper each and draw a nice picture. They had a lot of fun doing that! Then I simply took a piece of A4 card and stuck the two pictures down, one on the top corner and one on the bottom corner. They overlapped a little so I made sure none of the picture was overlapping then glued them down.
These are our favorites:
And I wonder how many preppers lose sight of the big picture: It’s not how much food or water or ammo or anything else you have that’s important. What matters is how long you and your family will be self-sufficient and not dependent upon the government or other cash- or resource-strapped entities when disaster strikes. Unless a disaster strikes my neighborhood in a manner that directly impacts my house or my family’s lives, I don’t plan to leave my house in search of resources in the event of a disaster. I will either make sure I have as close to everything I need before disaster strikes, or I and my family will find a substitute or do without. If you’re not working on becoming self-sufficient, you’re missing the whole reason you should be prepping. Not only do self-sufficient people ease the strain on scarce or nonexistent resources, but they are in a position to help others during those stuff-hits-the-fan events. It doesn’t take a lot of time or effort to stock up compared to the amount of time wasted in line waiting for help when you could be at home with your loved ones taking care of each other, or helping others. If you plan to wait on stocking up or otherwise becoming self-sufficient because everything looks fine right now, you could be the next disaster waiting to happen.
Why do we pray? Prayer brings us closer to God and God desires that we communicate with Him. He also chooses to use us as a part of His work. There are times when it is apparent that it is God’s will for His people to pray for someone in order for the healing or work to take place. There are times that it perhaps is God’s will, but people aren’t asking. These things are mysterious to us for sure. But, we know God sees the whole plan and has our best interest in mind. If He didn’t, He would not have died for us.
Major progress has been made towards equality in media. Guerrero said Americans have become more aware of racial representation, which is very important, since these portrayals “truly reflect how we view people.” This means that new markets are forming and new trends are being set. Public awareness has pressured producers to include more minorities in media.
I just found out a something about My Memories Suite that I HAD to share with you!
Behold! Only once in a lifetime are you given the opportunity to be in the presence of a special moment in time that will be known through out the ages as an event that influenced, inspired and changed everything that came after it. This is that moment. This week, the Carolyn and Joe Show venture out into the unknown as host Carolyn and Joe find themselves at the great Alliance Comics in Silver Spring Maryland in the presence of the great MOKA. Yes, ladies an gentlemen, representatives from the great MOKA podcast, Gene and Troy, have invaded the Carolyn and Joe Show. What type of conversations will happen on this historic event? Tune in and find out before its too late. PLUS MORE. Enjoy!
I am proud of silly songs, crazy dances, dressing up, and weird voices.
"So. Has she got the right bits and pieces? Sorry."
Do you dream about writing a book someday?
And I'm sure if we compared notes, anyone's list would be just as (if not more) hefty.
far from a grandmaster
Changed my layout to something more simple. To be honest, I'm losing my interest in blogging. And I don't have the mood to draw anything. I just spend my time online on Facebook, downloading song & software for my android.
Image: Unknown - Given To Me By My Mum
Then Saturday morning we had a nice breakfast and started getting ready for the big day. Grace looked so beautiful in her white communion dress (thank you, Aunt Nora). Abby was also excited to wear HER "first communion dress" (thank you, mom).
There would have been discussions, theories and investigations on the possibility that the world had reached an advanced civilization before 4000 BC.
Okay, I suck.
The way Johnny Cash speaks a lot of the lines, while singing others somehow makes the overall effect seem like the most sincere song you've ever heard sung, yet it's so funny, you like die laughing.
2010.08.19 Afghanistan Nangarhar 2 14 Two civilians are killed when the Taliban blow up a fuel truck.
Stand up, author-friends! Throw back your shoulders and lift up your chin! Take pride in your achievements—you deserve them.
"I'm not in a position to discuss this thing at this stage, but in a few days or a week you will hear the details," George told the newspaper.
Westway to the World
I'm not judging these models and actresses whose ads make them look decades younger in print. I can't imagine what it must be like to have your celebrated beauty fade in the public eye, to have the job offers stop pouring in, and to begin to feel invisible, just because you dared to get a little older.
Q. For long time you have been part of the IT industry, what been the changes the sector has witnessed since you joined?
and felt remorse for his treatment of his friend. He went immediately to
The trail was great that first day, but damn was it hot! I put a bandana under my hat pretty quick to get the sun off my ears and neck. The grades were easy despite the 2,000 feet of climbing. Toward the end of the day, some muscle in my left foot began to hurt and I had to take some vitamin I. Come on body…catch up, we’re hiking again! Eventually, I made it the 20 miles back to Lake Morena where some exceptionally awesome trail angels, the Andersons, had stayed and made chili for all the hikers. They even made veggie chili and had cold beer waiting! It was most excellent, especially to be greeted with a giant hug.
statements only seem to reinforce Alan Gross’ view that he is a
Our Father…
The following is based on my personal experiences and each company, depending on its size, location and make up, will behave differently. I don’t advocate sweeping-statements about cultures or people in general, but that said, you may relate to some of these situations and if so, I hope that the advice based on my own reactions is helpful to you. Take it with a grain of salt ;)
Everyone's schedule is different and therefore one routine does not fit all. Choose daily routines that work for you and your family. It could be as simple as listing three cleaning chores for the morning and three more for days end. Don't overwhelm yourself with enthusiasm or you might tire out. Handle some tasks today, and others tomorrow--it will all get done in time.
My first Christmas as a father.
I'd better get a letter week.
“When harsked hennyfink as to the function hov an object,” the old boy replied, “Simply say ‘That, aircraftsman, hizz designed for lightness and heaze hov manufacture’”. My father said that this gambit never failed.
Having been diagnosed with clinical depression, I suppose I felt that I was qualified to assume this trait spanned across the depression spectrum. But I don’t think that’s true. I’ve been depressed and still cared about things. I’ve been incapable of giving a damn about anything, while not being depressed.
Where did you get such an idea? Did you check it out for yourself?
The Second book of the Talent Trilogy needs to be finished. Gack. I know. Honestly, I only have a couple of thousand words to write on it, and it’s finished, but something has been holding me back with it. That book had a number of alternative endings – any of which I could use. However, I’m going to go with the one that seriously ramps up some emotions I think. Once I complete it – I need to throw myself into some serious planning for the third book, and that’s gonna mean re-reading the first and second book for me to do it. (Thank god I have a Kindle!) When I originally planned this trilogy years ago – it was a good plan – it just wasn’t robust enough for the world I was creating. I never expected the Talent world to get so big. Now it needs to be broken down and sorted out before I continue.
I realized that if I sent them to school to learn then what could I expect from them. No teacher at school loves them as much as I do. No friend they can make at school will be their for them like their sister does. What about the negative influences?
“Strauss-Kahn did have a very clear game-plan,” he agrees, “and it was one hell of a plan. He runs France, controls the IMF, saves the EU and goes into the history books. But did the US really care that much? I don’t know. To be frank, very few of them strike me as that bright. What I can tell you is that some of those near to DSK are talking big about this – saying the very foundations of Franco-American relations will be rocked to their foundations when the truth comes out. But there’s an election coming up – they would say that”.
“Call me.” I shout as you leave in an awkward flurry of apologies and mild embarrassment. Later that day a hand scribbled note appears.
They brought money and oranges for their grandma and grandma was felt so happy.
You will need half a cup of organic cocoa powder. Make sure the ingredients say only “cocoa” and nothing else. You will also need some heavy whipping cream and some olive oil; enough to make a thick paste that won’t drip off of your face: make a liquid mixture of about 3/4 cream and 1/4 olive oil.
In short, the problem with Muslims is not simply that they contain some number of would-be terrorists in their ranks. The problem with Muslims is that they are Muslims, and that they therefore think like Muslims, act like Muslims, and have the characteristics of Muslims. Once one understands this, one has made the crucial cognitive leap. Of course there are decent people amongst the Muslim population of the UK, people who pose us no problems and wish only to live in peace. But similar people will exist in all Muslim countries, including the most horrendously dysfunctional, sharia-infested hellholes, such as Pakistan. The problem is that their numbers are too small for the characteristics of the societies they live in to derive significantly from them, in Pakistan, in Britain, or anywhere else.
and how the last several years I've become so very aware of being a grown up.
I couldn’t have said it better myself when it comes to life and baseball. But when it comes to fly fishing, what do you believe in? We all have those special flies that we just trust, that we know deep down in the cockles of our hearts that just plain work. Perhaps it’s traditional fly with a pedigree to match? Or is it a junk fly that you would never tell your friends at the trout club for fear of ridicule? Or better yet, is it a recipe of your own creation? What is it about our pursuit that you have as much conviction in as your own religion? Maybe fly fishing is your religion? What gear would you never ever do without? As I was sitting down at the vise prepping for my annual weekend trip with CW to Presque Isle Bay it got me thinking. What do I believe in?
Distributed by GSC Movies, The Lady will be released in selected cinemas here and in Penang, Ipoh and Malacca on May 3.
Lord, I am willing, to -
was the infernal standing around and waiting
Glamorous?
Janie
- 1/2 c. all-purpose flour
But this time, he shared something new. He was awarded the First Honor rank by his school. To prove it, he turned and delivered the prayer that his teachers asked him to memorize. In strict Kapampangan accent, he finished the speech with Amen. His Tita’s and Tito’s who played as audience were very happy, assuring him that he can now join everybody on their trip to the beach. EJ immediately jumped out of the mini stage and then went inside to fix his things.
In order to continually experience life, liberty and happiness as promised, nature’s God demands obedience to His law to protect those rights. This is where we have fallen short and therefore, in order not to lose the blessings of freedom, the people of the world must turn from the sole focus on rights, and recognize the inherent and required responsibilities that we have.
I’m phone stoopid.
We had a beautiful 80 degree plus morning brunch filled with family I hadn’t seen in WAY TOO LONG! Some the last time I saw them they were still teenagers and now are almost 30 and have kids of their own.
Do I recommend it: Of course. In fact I've already started recommending it to some of my stronger readers this year. And the front cover alone inspired a whole host of 'scary' stories .
Sometimes recognizing what a blog is for is simply good to help use this tool to its fullest extent while not creating a perception that I need to be in a straight jacket.
“The process makes it virtually impossible to remove a teacher within a reasonable amount of time,” Mr. Klein said in an interview. “Nobody thinks that the number of cases is reflective of the teachers who should be removed.”
Believe it or not, there were bad singers even before the technology existed to make them sound good through auto-tune. Back then, they had other people sing while the good looking people lip synched to them. Then Britain invented this thing called "The Beatles" who both could sing and make girls produce excretions of which they had never produced before. Our teen pop-stars of today are from Canada. Thanks, eh?
Today is also the day you can finally have a look at 4th issue of Whimsy Inspirations Magazine - and seriously, it would be SO worth your time to check it out. Ideas and talent and tutorials galore!!
After two very busy weeks, we have a third very busy week – but a week that winds up before the semester pretty much comes to an end while we wait for the summer concert season to start with the Bach Dancing and Dynamite Society, the Madison Early Music Festival, Opera in the Park and the Token Creek Chamber Music Festival and other groups or performers.
One way Teddy helps them find more space is by “finishing off” their basement. The basement seems like a low-cost option. However, Teddy and the contractors at TLC Construction thoroughly and carefully inspect the basement area to see what will be required and how extensive the project will be. From their experience, they know to look for things that are not in the right place. For example: sometimes gas lines are not in the walls or ceiling joist; wiring (cable, phone, house, etc.) may be on the surface; and ducting may limit the movement of light fixtures. Recently, TLC was asked to create an open floor plan in a basement that was already finished. After the initial visit, they knew the posts were not all in the right place and some were even hidden in the walls.
Having seen Butcher Boy so often this past couple of years, I thought they had run out of the ability to surprise me. But no.
So why is he just so fucking awesome? Well, let’s take the current situation: Dan has been tasked with destroying the cruiseliner Gai will be meeting Arisa’s father on. But they only have surface-to-air missiles! What are they going to do?
“Let it go… it’s over.. let it be.. Gods speed”
Says Chris Squire: ‘In the Present’ perfectly describes our experience in rediscovering these songs all over again while performing them in concert, as if for the very first time.”
(iii) considering whether or not the claimed invention, starting from the closest prior art and the objective technical problem, would have been obvious to the skilled person.
JFK TWA Terminal by Eero Saarinen
Even a 24 hour delivery, for which you have to pay more takes more than one week to deliver.
Feeling just the tiniest bit hep that my comments on the duplicitous coverage by CBS Washington of the March For Life got picked up by bigger and better bloggers and journalists, went viral, and ended up causing CBS to "fix" their error by publishing photos of actual pro-lifers at a pro-life March.
Never has a greater love been so mistreated, never has a greater love been abused, rejected, forsaken, and trampled upon than the love of our God. It is the love of God which we must look at in order to find an answer to dealing with our own love issues. “For God so loved the world”. God still loved after all the rejection by mankind. God still cared for us with a love so powerful that it had no conditions, had no restraint; it was in love that He gave His Son to die for our sins.
Imagines herself as Elizabeth Taylor
I've been working sort of slow on this project. Mostly because it seems like a lot of the time when I'm working I'm thinking of my deadline or other things that need to get done and I really need to just slow down....I have some photos of the first few pages for tonight and then hopefully over the next week I'll be able to post the rest.
“I can see why you don’t like it. But I can’t get my book published any other way. There are millions of writers out there, and only a few of them get a publishing deal. It’s luck more than talent these days.”It saddened me that she considered publication some sort of lottery, rather than the meritocracy it really (mostly) is. It also saddened me to think that she valued her work so little that not only was she prepared to give it away, she was also prepared to pay someone to take it off her hands. This has to be wrong: we all work hard at our writing, and we should recognise its true worth. Even if our work is not appropriate for mainstream publication it still has value, which can be measured by the efforts we’ve put into it and the satisfaction we’ve derived from writing it: why hand it over to a company which is only interested in how much money you give it, and not how well your book reads, looks or sells?
I am thankful for this opportunity...
3. In a non stick pan add 1 tsp of oil. Just when the oil heats up add the cumin seeds. When the seeds starts to splutters add the finely chopped onions and fry till it turns slightly brown on the edges.
The stories will one day make the journey from addled mind to stubby fingers, in the meantime I'll just keep making more.
Fifth, I installed chicken wire. Sorry kids! As helpful as the boys were, they were also getting into it and throwing their toys in there. No more! Any toys that end up in the garden are mine. Also, this will keep Justin from picking the tomatoes (I had a few last year and he picked them ALL before they were even ripe). The chicken wire is also handy for keeping out our cat.
The St. Patrick’s Day parade in New York was started by the Ancient Order of Hibernians, a Catholic organization. The Hibernians ran the parade up until the 90’s – now a separate, independent group runs it. The way the Catholics uphold the “gays can’t march” rule is due to a 1990′s Supreme Court decision in Boston that deemed the St. Patrick’s Day parade a “private, religious procession”. Yes, the biggest Irish parade in the world is a “private, religious procession”. WTF. It’s also important to note that the entire concept, idea, and original parade was conducted by a group of Irish soldiers. Better said, Irish-American soldiers. They marched downtown up to the original St. Patrick’s church on Mott and Prince, were blessed by the priest, and then headed off to the Irish pubs to get drunk. The parade TODAY is till led by the 165th cavalry, which is supposed to act as an extension of those original Irish soldiers. It is amazing to me that an organization that is SO linked with the U.S. military, would hold fast to its anti-gay practices even after the entire U.S. military has abandoned them!
The programs room at the DA Jones Branch was turned into a lovely movie lounge for our event last Friday – floor cushions, body pillows, total comfort!
Finish them.
Title Of Album: Knew You Were Waiting The Best Of Aretha Franklin 1980-1998
The tired Rocker dog laughed and sped on by, focused on Moon and joined Chav Harry in his pursuit of the Mod whippet.
For more information on keynote speakers, schedule, registration and conference information go to: http://net4dem.org/mayglobal
I MARRIED A CULT FIGURE FROM SALFORD
Several people have come forward as a result of the Plan B for Hay campaign, including Rhona Muirhead. Several candidates live on or near Broad Street - at South Bank House, and Tinto House and in Bridge Street. Ellie Spencer of the WI and scouts is also standing as an independent.
With all of the cool stuff that JetPens has been getting in stock recently, I am turning more and more into a ballpoint pen fan. I have always viewed ballpoints as messy and inconsistent, but of course that is coming from someone with very little ballpoint experience. This Pilot Symmetry really impressed me from the moment I opened the package. And I'll be the first to admit that it took me a few seconds to figure out which end to press to get the tip of the pen to come out! Once I got that under control, I put it to the test and it performed great. It lays down a nice, clean, and fine line that rivals any other ballpoint I've tested recently. The click part of the pen is neat in that it is contained in a rubber sheath that turns concave when you click it in (see additional picture below). I even slid the window on the pen over to D (for dowdyism of course!) because I am cool like that.
So, yeah, kind of finding that the little things are getting to me lately.
Is that really such a big deal? Well, it might be. When many Christians today use the term “personal relationship with Christ,” what they are really talking about is a “private relationship with Christ.” More and more believers are opting-out of church altogether and are choosing to have a more personal religion. The idea is that my religious faith is between only me and God and doesn’t need to involve anyone else. The bottom line, we are told, is that “It’s not about religion; it’s about relationship.”
4. Shochu. Why shocho (and its Korean cousin soju) haven’t stronger followings in this country is puzzling to me. Shochu, which is a Japanese distilled beverage averaging between 25% and 35% alcohol by volume, is made out of everything from grains like rice and buckwheat to vegetables like sweet potatoes and carrots. Some Japanese aficianodos will describe it as a Japanese vodka, but it’s quite different: it’s not as strong and it’s much more flavorful.
Do you find that when you get the ''women's'' sizes, they think you have the shoulders of a linebacker WITH his shoulder pads on, perky boobs with darts that end really close to your chin, and armholes that go to your bellybutton? Patterns or store bought, do they use real, full sized gals for a fitting? Sure doesn't seem like it. One of the many reasons I sew. :-)
Of course, I realize my friends and family have their own lives to live. I truly want good things to happen to the people I love. But somehow, whenever big changes happen in my relationships and to the people around me, they catch me off guard. While I’m certain all these things may happen someday, I never expect them to happen today.
With that total I made 150 gallons of beer. I think I had one or two gift certificates that saved just a touch and I know that one batch was commissioned by a friend (he paid for the recipe). About $1000 was for equipment that I can use the rest of my life - I got another CO2 tank and a beergas system.
L’Oreal Infallible Eye Shadow in Midnight Blue – outer ¼ of lid, over eyeliner on outer lower lashline
Tomorrow, I go in for a bone marrow test. As I’ve said, I’ve had a couple and they are less than fun. But how’d we get here? Well, it all started 9 years ago…
“Jah, she slipped out durin’ the night, far as we can tell.”
This afternoon this blog hit 2,000 hits per month. Yahoo!
“She has two babies and they both look like her!”
Today this ends
may encounter.
So what is left?
And disappointment we have felt
With innovative Hi-Active Bond in pure rosehip essence, White++ Mask whitens, eliminates all freckles and blemishes at ultra speed. Combined with scientific proofed whitening ingredient, Licorice extract, White++ Mask offers you a more crystalline, porcelain-like compleion than ever.
4Does he not see my ways, and are not my steps all numbered?
When we got home, I gave him two tiny cupcakes. He and Jordan are having a party together later this month, but I couldn’t let the day go by without candles to blow out.
The class will be an introduction to bourbon and other American whiskeys, but we'll get as 'advanced' as the class wants and time permits.
Like so many other parts of relationships, communication is the key here. If you want to work on being in charge, work on being up front, and blunt. Stop asking, and start directing.
If you choose to stay in your home, you may need to make changes to improve accessibility and comfort. Your state’s assistive technology project can help with equipment and design specifications, local sources, and financial assistance for everything from ramps to remodels.
143. Tar Beach: Faith Ringgold
The lyrics for the following two demos were NOT ones I myself discovered. They were primarily decoded by my good friend Mr. Darkman. He's already published the lyrics on JoyDiv.org in one of the forums for all to see, so I'm sure there's no harm in me reproducing them here. He presented his decoded work to Peter Hook, who rewrote the words slightly for his band's version, based off of the two demos.
2 more days
Maybe I should grow up?
At one point he told the listeners that he's almost 70 years old and can't believe that he's still having to write about the issue of sexual identity and acceptance almost 25 years after A Prayer for Owen Meany. Irving, I think, even shocked Diane when he stopped just short of calling Americans neanderthals - I believe the word troglodytes may have been broached - when it comes to sexual mores.
New glasses, on order (two pairs! for the first time ever...I'm really getting in touch with the times now).
I start off with 2 cups of the baking mix, 2 tbs flaxseed meal. Add skim milk or 2% milk until you get a lumpy, sticky batter....drop spoon-sized biscuits into boiling chicken mixture on stove. Heat on low, simmer for 10 minutes without lid, then 10 minutes with the lid. Make sure dumplings are cooked through!
Located in Mammoth Lakes on the eastern edge of Yosemite National Forest, the brewery was founded by Sam Walker in 1995, who sold it to current owner Sean Turner in 2006. Turner explains that what makes his beer unique is that at 8,000 feet, water boils at 198 degrees Fahrenheit, rather than 212 degrees at sea level, resulting in a softer flavor profile in the brewing process. He also adds that a 8,000 feet, the mountain water they use is the purest being furthest upstream. Mammoth is known for their Golden Trout Pilsner, Epic IPA, IPA 395, Double Nut Brown, and Hair of the Bear Doppelbck among their more popular beers. They've won a slew of awards at the California State Fair and other beer competitions, so they must be doing a lot right.
So for those of you who did not catch the title of yesterday's and today's post, I will tell you that it is a line from the song "The Rain, the Park, and Other Things," (you can hear the song here). When I was thinking about my floral series for the weekend, I couldn't help but sing the song aloud. It is somewhat meaningful to me because my mom loves it so much. She was just recently married to her first love (they dated in high school but didn't find each other again until about three years ago), and this was a song that was special to them. Apparently, my step-dad called my mom his 'flower girl." Hence the title of my series.
I’ve dreamed about her last nite, we’re talked in English and she’s pretty master it *it’s really surprised me that she’s fluent talk in English*, and sometimes i used my fuckin japanese to her *and she just gave me her lovely pretty smile*. We’ve been chatting in one tall building, and we could see a Tokyo tower from the inside.
3) Sieve the mixture and add in young coconut juice and its pulp. Mix thoroughly.
Like an overweight doctor that tells me to lose weight, I sit here and preach about this as if I have “torn down that wall” and mastered this technique, when in real life, I have not. My three girls are going to read just about everything I write and so are my sisters, my nieces and nephews and maybe even a few of you, so am I going to write very Neeckkeed? Probably not. For my purposes, I don’t think I need to. I will let “Momma Lou” do all the really colorful language, but maybe I should shed a few layers and still be in line with what is called for.
Keen to find out more, I headed to Everest Kitchen in Marrickville for this month's Eat This column in Time Out Sydney.
My third ATC is using a gorgeous Penny Black Mimi stamp. She is such a sweetie and looks so angelic with blonde hair! I tried to just keep to blue and silver for this ATC, using a little lace and gems as finishing touches.
Also I have decided to make my own miniature bread labels, after all the breads do come from the After Dark Miniature bakery ;) so I thought that would add a nice touch especially for bread displays.
It wasn't that way for Chad in all of his classes I'm sorry to say, for in that very same semester one teacher hightailed it home to lick his wounds, and he never came back. Another teacher told me that it was Chad who had done said teacher in. He was doubtless a contributing factor at the very least.
His heart-strings crack, he stoops his knightly helm,
Mr. President, sir, I just want to say all the help and support the people of the United States to the people of Afghanistan did, I thank you for that from the bottom of my heart, sir. And I just thank you. And also, we just want to thank you, sir, for all the — which is provide all the necessity to bring this strategic partnership for signing tonight. And I just thank you, all your team — Ryan Crocker, Ambassador Crocker, General Allen — I thank them for the hard work that with our team worked together. They very patiently worked together to continue this dialogue. Today we will see the result of this talking and communication — today we sign.
Sharon and I enjoyed our stay there. After returning from Schnepf Farms, we cleaned up and hit the bar. We couldn’t resist the yummy chicken quesadilla. When we returned to the room is when the craziness began. We had a little champagne, did our strobe dance, followed by our lockdown, and the PJ ghost hunt. Check out Sharon’s video of the hunt: http://autumnforestghosthunter.blogspot.com/2010/10/pajama-ghost-hunt-first-ever.html
Now this sounds idyllic if you're the one knocking on the door, but if you're the one answering it in your pyjamas which you had planned to keep on all day whilst lounging on the sofa with a book and eating nothing but crisps, the scenario may not be as ideal. Maybe that beaming grin is actually a muscle spasm caused by the shock of opening the door to the couple with the hyperactive children who were so kind as to decorate your walls with inedible ink while you had to look through 500 photos of their trip to the beach. "Oh, look there's the little one with a full bucket. Look, here he is with an empty bucket. Ah, look at him filling the bucket..."
Lucifer was one of the most beautiful angels in all of heaven. So much so that he believed he could rival the Lord and plotted against him with a band of other recruited angels. God banished Lucifer to the pits of Hell for all eternity and turned him into an ugly offensive beast. Ever since the dawn of time Lucifer has been scheming to break free from Hell and return to Heaven to claim what we most desired. The kingdom of Heaven.
There are so many reasons I love living in Paris. The aesthetics of the place, the rich cultural heritage, the wine, the food ...
3) Household forms are included in the front of the planner as well. These include things like birthday lists, addresses and phone numbers, budget form, greeting card lists, cleaning routines, and chore lists.
07. ... (2:55)
I can’t help but look back on 2011 and think how it’s flown by. I’m grateful for all the lessons I’ve learned. First and foremost, I’ve had to learn the hard way that, much to my consternation, I can’t do everything. I bit off more than I could chew and the results weren’t exactly to my liking.
When design holes and cutouts, you should keep the distance from the edge of the hole (or cutout) to the start of the inside bend radius at least 2 times the material thickness. The holes or cutouts will distort during the sheet metal bending process if the distance is too close. If you must have holes close to the bend, then the holes or cutouts should be extended beyond the bend line (across the bend line).
027.031 YUSUFALI: "'Be ye not arrogant against me, but come to me in submission (to the true Religion).'"
Now, it was my turn to pace. The climb out of Twin Lakes (in that direction) lasts for about 7 miles. Greg was eating well now, thanks to Sophia. He was also climbing well. But when we left the single-track trails and got onto jeep roads, where the terrain gets flatter, wider, and relatively boring, he lost his forward momentum. This is where a pacer earns his keep: you have to find a way to motivate your runner to actually RUN, using every method possible, (up to and including a Taser, if you have one handy). Unfortunately, I had left all of my torture devices at home, (in the bedroom closet, of course).
"Whatever!"
In 2008, Beyonce adopted “SASHA” Fierce, Vehicle of Baphomet, as an alter personality symbolic representation of a Luciferian Blood Scarifice for Fame, Fortune and Power.[17] Another coincidence, I really don’t believe so.
Nicky McLauchlan
On it read,
It was standing room only at the public meeting in Verwood last night as residents planned their next move to stop Hampshire County Council digging up 700,000 square metres of Moors Valley Country Park land for sand and gravel extraction.
Package Deal: All 6 Days and 18 meals $325 (early bee price until May 15…$350 after May 15).
Al-Quso was wanted by the FBI after being indicted in the U.S. for his participation in the 2000 bombing in the USS Cole in Aden, Yemen, in which killed 17 American sailors during the Clinton years. He also played a part in assisting and training Umar Farouk Abdulmutallab, 'The Underwear Bomber' in his failed attempt to bring down a commercial airliner on a flight to Detroit back in Christmas of 2009.
Plus, as I use the smileys quite often in my chats, it would be quite freaky to see mini smiley mes popping up across the screen!
Lockwood became one of Australia’s best known communists, not only as a journalist, but as an orator, a prolific pamphleteer, intellectual, author, and a key figure in the Royal Commission into Espionage in Australia, 1954-1955. He remained a member of the Communist Party until he allowed his membership to lapse, and dropped out in 1969, following a long disillusionment which culminated during the Prague Spring with the Soviet Union’s invasion of Czechoslovakia in 1968.
Can Magnus save his new-found family from the evil force threatening all the ocean’s creatures? And will he find the friend he has always dreamed of?
“Yes” other shouted in one tone.
Susan Elizabeth Phillips did a workshop on using character to drive plot and I’m so glad I attended. The more I hear her speak, the better I feel about my own process. Our writing styles and methods are similar and although I do try other things, it always comes back to be being a pantser and writing until I figure out my characters. Some of the exercises she had us do got me thinking about my WIP (on which I’ve been a little stalled) and I now have new ideas about how to fix it.
Joining in this week with Suzanne, The Colorado Lady for VTT. I haven't participated for several months now but thought that someone may be interested in my vintage Christmas Ornament swap, since we all have a love for vintage goods.
4.) Thank the person who gave you the award
“Nice tail,” I said.
I am sure there are more CF books specifically for children out there. But, at this point, I only know of these three books for kids. I have tried to get my hands on two copies of each book, if at all possible. I keep one good copy of each book tucked away so that I can bring out a nice clean copy when and if I ever need to use the book to teach Bennett/Oliver/their friends about CF. But I have placed the other copy of these books along with the children's other general books in order to normalize Cystic Fibrosis and to allow the children to read these books on their own and at their choosing.
I am a day late, but better late than never right? I’ve been a sick girl this week. A lot of catching up to do and boy you should see my email box WOW! lots. I’ve been able to visit the wonderful blogs that I am following (I followed alot, you guys are just too amazing!) and read their reflections post. I already knew before hand what I wanted to do with my reflections post of this wonderful challenge.
Fashion or Style?
The oxford dictionary defines a community as ‘a group of people living in the same place or having a particular characteristic in common’. This means that a group of people can be detonated as ‘community’ if they possess similar traits, follow a common objective and/or have the same ambition in a like-minded matter. At this initial stage of the documentary and considering the aforementioned definition I trust that Tough Mudder participants and patrons can be described as a community. In the process of this documentary it will become clearer if the intercommunity is based on a search for adventure, an athletic challenge, escaping the routine, some entirely unexpected reasoning or a mixture of all of them.
In terms of strategic (social world bound rationality) actions, things are obviously a bit more complicated when trying to judge whose rationality is better, or are they really? The survival chances of the individual amid the inevitable Darwinian power struggles within a group are infinitely higher when the excesses of the aforementioned are mediated through consciously created institutions (e.g. the Rule of Law) that are not bound to the claims to power of any other individual. That this is obviously not the case in Noble Savage societies is glaringly evident. When tribal kings (like Mandela’s friend, Robert Mugabe) kill their fellow countrymen in order to survive, then their actions are strategically rational – no argument about that. But seeing that we can safely assume that the innocent person to be killed (e.g. the ‘witch’ in my example) has also been amply endowed with the normal Darwinian survival instincts, it would be irrational of her/him not to take adequate strategic actions to ensure his/her continued survival. Without stepping into the field of morality; if non-ruling Noble Savage individuals had acted rationally, according to my notion of ‘survivability’, then a sort of ‘French Revolution’ would’ve been inevitable – something sadly lacking in all Noble Savage societies. In short; in terms of strategic actions, Noble Savage rulers are rational but their followers aren’t. To summarize; Noble Savage societies are ‘less’ rational than Western societies when it comes to engendering successful ‘survivability’ through instrumental and well as strategic actions. So much for much-vaunted Noble Savage superiority!
Tine vs. Deliverance...goes to Tine. I have never heard of anyone turning the delivery room into their own personal water park with an exploding bag of waters. Unlike some people who would've been totally horrified to do something like that, I found it completely amusing. It took my mind off the pain and gave us a little laugh. Actually, I think this "versus" will have to go to Chloe. I hope that she will always be able to find the humor in life, laugh at herself, and know that she was able to bring joy even with the terrible pain of labor. We will always remember her special day, and the poor nurse who luckily was only 30 minutes from the end of her shift. I imagine a hot, sterilizing shower was in order after that work day...
each bruise and bite-
Just for the record...I don't eat salmon. Ever. For any reason. Ever.
This is my book.
“I assimilated a mandarin high collar and the front of the dress has a shield detail. I used neutral colors to incorporate the camouflage theme,” said Taiwo on her winning design.
Wu W, Zhang Y, Zhang F. Studies on semen quality in workers exposed to manganese and electric welding. (Chinese) Zhonghua Yu Fang Yi Xue Za Zhi 1996; 30: 266-268.
Garnier Skin Renew Miracle Skin Perfector BB Cream in Light/Medium
2. TV guide Page 606 pulled up the TV guide – which many found essential and well laid out. People have taken to Twitter, using the hashtag #ceefaxmemories to mourn the loss of Ceefax’s TV listings.
On the road to the pub is a small and folded wooden sign and as we get closer, me and Moon stop to read its brightly written words -
See you after 26.2!
This type of carefully controlled environment reminded me of something—life within the Watchtower Society. Jehovah’s Witnesses are taught to inform on one another “to keep the congregation clean.” They are told Jehovah will hold them responsible if they do not report the sins of one another and to be complicit brings the same death penalty as the sin.
A few years ago, writers needed a lot of bullying even to get a website. The thought of promoting themselves online was anathema to most of them. Even those who were happy to go into schools, go to festivals, and do readings (ie not hermits) didn't like the idea of engaging with the online world. I've had a website since, I think, 1998. I got a Facebook page in the first weeks that it opened up outside universities, and a twitter account in 2007. I'm not against anything digital. Perhaps because I had these things long before anyone I might want to promote my work to had them, I've never been big on online promotion. I have a presence; I don't (in Nicola Morgan's words) bug the pants off people.
The author is said to be Dr. Emanuel Tanay, a well-known and well-respected psychiatrist. His references to past history are accurate and clear.
Knigge’s kept the Order’s original grades untouched but added new grades above them. The second level of the Illuminati incorporated the grades of Freemasonry making therefore the Brotherhood simply a part of the wider Illuminist superstructure.
Well, the first semi-serious run, that is. after having my physiotherapist bust up scar tissue in the ankle, i figured i might as well run on it while it is already tender. i have taken on a couple of light 1k jogs already this year, but nothing above 4.5k since early November. so i ran 6k today at a very light pace, on new shoes. ran down to the pond, stopped to feed the ducks, then ran to the animal shelter to visit and cuddle with about 20 orphaned cats, then ran home. good cardio work with lots of breaks. rolled the ankle a few times on the icy uncleared snowy walking trails, but no major issues.
It's obvious that many writers give up when they are stuck, rather than exploring how to fill up the creative well, as Cameron recommends. The Inner Critic gets excited, shuts the creative gate, and that's that for the book project sometimes. I hope more writers allow their support networks to coach them through this stage, past the discomfort, and encourage them to explore something new.
2008: Duck (became the POTM for March 2012)
Are you ever surprised when you get compliments on what you think is an ordinary outfit?
(He’s actually wearing his cape in this fascinating extended interview, in which he discusses the story of pirate radio, and which surely gives the lie to any suggestion that the man wasn’t charismatic!)
On Sunday I am going to the UK with my friend Lesley. We will take the boat from Kristiansand to Newcastle (I think) and thence drive down to Lewes, where she is from. I'm psyched for many reasons, not least of which it will be nice to learn about a new part of England, and also, I get to leave Rich behind with the boxes. (Hey, Me, Evil, remember?) Lesley and I and her daughter Wendy will go hiking and exploring and hopefully, the gorgeous weather we are FINALLY having in Norway will also follow us there. It's 82 degrees here right now! Wow!
1/4 cup plain non-fat greek yogurt
Nicola Bryant: I'm so sorry to have to say I've just had a call to say Liz Sladen has died. It's too much to take in, but it's true. How tragically young.
First of all, you're going to need some place to stay. Having friends to stay with is great - especially if they work so much staying at their place is the only way to actually meet them - but my most heartily recommendation would be to check in at the Hongdae Guesthouse 2.0 - Yellow Submarine. For a sum less than a nightly taxi fare to the outskirts of Seoul (not to mention saving the trouble of getting a taxi at that hour as a foreigner - especially one that'll actually consider taking you there) you get a bed to stay in close to Hongdae, a mere 5 minute walk from all the noise which as far as I'm concerned is just perfect. There's internet and breakfast, but most importantly the people running the place are fantastic human beings. The guests I've encountered there have all been great too, so even if your plans are canceled last-minute you can be sure to have a great time just hanging out with the hostel people. I'd pick the Yellow Submarine over a fancy hotel any time, and even now when my situation has changed so that I couldn't stay there myself I drop by just to say hi. This has nothing to do with Korean indie music but is the most valuable tip I can provide.
Wall Decal: I found inexpensive tea theme wall decal at ACE Hardware in Jakarta some time ago, so I picked up the wall decal. The price was somewhere between US$10-15.
Her fingers lingered on the thin fabric. She remembered another time, another dress. A simple white one that hung on her young shoulders, just skimmed the cement of the courthouse steps. The ache that squeezed her heart had faded with time, but it was there all the same. Would it ever go away?
I had so much fun and we even commented how
But as we've learned in life, over and over, it's not always easy, there are things you have to do that are sometimes the only option for survival.
Throughout the recent performance Freeman played the role of genial host. One moment he was encouraging the bassist: “Hit it, Mendai!” The next he was indulging in Von-speak, adding the ending “-ski” to proper nouns, turning himself into “Vonski” and the Duke Ellington piece into “Caravanski.” And in another he was explaining, in a tone half mocking and half serious, the unpredictable nature of jazz: “Sometimes this horn plays and sometimes it doesn’t. I have no control over it.”
Zachariah had striking blue eyes, dark brown scruffy hair and a thin scraggly little beard. He was deeply tan and fit and wore shorts most of the time with no shirt or shoes; he carried a green canvas backpack that was always loaded with fruit and nuts that he would share with me.
Lately, I have been trying to not let stress get me too riled up. But it is so easy to do when you loose faith even a little. I'm in this constant battle in my head with "everything happens as it's supposed to" and "oh no! maybe I should do A, B, and C in hopes I get D!"
-- "I feel a bit like crying," I confess pathetically to the Argentinian businessman ...So it did give you that hint; but because you think that this is what tango is, you've ignored the accurate information coming from a bit deeper down in your brain. I congratulate you on the good instincts, but not on the research quality or the final decision.
dont miss the old place even a teensy bit. I learnt a lot on my own there ..being a rigger, an animator and a team lead. But it
So paying less for rent, especially when Little Brother is in and sharing it with me, will mean that I can really start making a dent in the debt that's accumulated over the past year. Plus the savings from the car end of things. And just think of the exercise I will get with that walking! It's a really nice area of the city too, with nice little restaurants, and so close to the rivers, parks and lots of places to ride my bike.
A hand that gave a second chance.
You see, there are many recipes for turkey gumbo but I like the way we do it around these parts. Here in lower Alabama, we prefer one rich in the traditional ingredients of using the holy trinity stirred into a dark roux and adding smoked sausage, the rich turkey stock plus the addition of sweet Creole or small tomatoes and the tasty thickener okra. The complexity of taste from these ingredients is a gumbo like no other.
*NOTE* Allow a day or two for your entry to appear here.
A. Must persistently and strongly identify with the opposite gender (aside from desiring any perceived cultural advantage of being the other gender). In children, the disturbance is manifested by four (or more) of the following:
People that cut you off on the freeway.
So you had an argument with your better half / parents / friends? You've been having a financial stress? Dealing with health issues? Problems at work?
I'm having a big think about how I'm going to balance and juggle all the things I want to do and have to do. How to teach four days a week, keep designing and selling as Bobo Bun, enjoy family life and do all the general dogsbody PA stuff I seem to do for my lot. There are things I've realised I'll have to drop for a bit is we're all going to keep sane. So I'm trying to think of new ways of doing stuff so I only have to chuck a few.
In her autobiography, Exner also managed to include photographic evidence of plane tickets, tickets to JFK’s inauguration and other pieces of evidence to bolster her claim that she and JFK had an affair. However, in 1988, she changed her tune and in an article in People magazine written by Kitty Kelley, Exner claimed for the first time that she was ferrying information and money back and forth between Kennedy and Giancana. In fact she claimed that the only reason that she spent time with Giancana at all was because JFK had asked her to. Later she claimed that Robert F. Kennedy knew that she was carrying money and information back and forth between JFK and Giancana.
For many, this is the perfect ending to a story of academic excellence. For Clark, it was just the beginning. After three years in Stanford, he formed Silicon Graphics along with other colleagues at the said university. The company manufactured graphics workstations, which evolved into graphical UNIX workstations equipped with high-speed hardware for graphics rendering. Within a decade, Clark and his co-founders were able to make the company a world leader in 3-D imaging and movie visual effects.
After Straatligkinders decided to take a break, Bouwer together with Glaskas Frontman, Deon Meiring ventured into a completely different music direction, – with the Afrikaans folky pop act Dans Dans Lisa. More recently, he endeavoured on a solo path, pioneered by his first solo album; Almal maak voute – with the ‘v’- being an intended spelling error.
She needed reassurance that her body's betrayal was a fluke, and wouldn't be repeated......
Here we are in dandelion heaven. I keep waking up so early lately...can't hardly sleep until 6.
Habsburg Dynasty was one of the most powerful dynasties in the world who commanded large amount of Europe for over 200 years since 1516–1700. The members of the dynasty frequently married close relatives in such a way that uncle-niece, first cousins and other consanguineous unions were prevalent in that dynasty. In the historical literature, it has been suggested that inbreeding was a major cause responsible for the extinction of the dynasty when the king Charles II, physically and mentally disabled, died in 1700 and no children were born from his two marriages. When Charles II died in 1700 the line of the Spanish Habsburgs died with him and a new dynasty- the French Bourbons- was installed in Spain.
how a particle of glass tore a fissure in
The next piece of News is that Southern Star Brewing will be celebrating its FIRST Anniversary on March 27th (a Friday) at 6pm at the brewery. We plan on having a band play and of course the tasting bar will be open. Though we won't be serving any food, but the admission is FREE and no reservations are required!
I did have a couple other *minor* issues with the story. First was my big question about whether Godspeed had ANY contact with Earth anymore-- I found it difficult to wrap my head around the idea of putting this big of an effort into sending humans out into space to inhabit a whole new planet and then not have any means of communication between Earth and the ship. Secondly, I didn't really find many of the "shock value" elements of the dystopian world aboard Godspeed to be all that "shocking" or new. The empty drone-like citizens, the mad-scientist doctor who messes with DNA and reproduction, the manipulation of history to conceal the past, and the euthanasia of the elderly-- I've read about all of this before in other books. But at the same time, it did enforce just how desperate Eldest was to maintain total and absolute control over society on the ship, and also just how desperate this society was becoming after being stuck inside metal walls for hundreds of years...
Not only does Telluric Currents help me to keep casting (without making me go OOM like Exorcism or the like would) it gives me MORE mana. Don’t ask me for numbers, because everywhere people look at numbers, it looks as if Telluric Currents would barely break even, let along refill your mana bar. But I tell you – it works.
I found it amazing that Mae NEVER used her oven...that's right... she kept it filled with candy. I am not sure that it was ever turned on. All of their meals were prepared on the stove top or in an electric skillet that always set out. When we spent the night we were given foods such as canned salisbury steak and instant mashed potatoes to eat... I thought they were wonderful. (I must confess that as an adult I've "tried" those again, just to have that memory, and they AREN'T that great!) My grandmother would poach us eggs for breakfast, and I still remember just how the egg poacher looked. She also kept her fridge stocked with small glass bottles of Coca Cola!!!
time just making lots of things in a time crunch. I know...weird, right?
So after she got sick and wasn't sleeping so well, she went back to sleeping well for a couple nights... but then started waking once or twice, and then it got to four or five times. We did move her into the nursery a couple weeks ago, but still in her rock n play and still swaddled. When she kept waking up 4-5 times a night just to be rocked and put back down, or sometimes staying up for an hour, we decided it was time to sleep train!
holy wine
Well, you know
“I really enjoyed my time here at Create and would like to thank all those who helped me during my time here.”
With my tax documents on the front seat of the CRV this morning, I drove to town. Mrs. Gordon was waiting for me at her apartment complex north of the city. She’s an elderly lady who retired from GE years ago, but prepares taxes to supplement her Social Security.
On the eye - Orange amber. Particularly 'fruity' looking.
So I’m really irritated when my colleague only sporadically writes down when I explain to her what she is supposed to do. I know, people learn in different ways. And I’m irritated because she doesn’t learn in MY way. (My way or the highway)
Couldn’t He just command and that thing should happen? Or why even command?
Some of them are quite bright, and, given how many of the assignments are credit/no-credit, should have the highest marks in the class. Throughout the entire semester, they don’t do any of the work, whether their in-class work or the rare homework assignment I’ve assigned.
Hannah MontanaHannah Montana
Now boasting about my self is not a good thing. If I brag about my self, show off or toot my own horn, well, it’s just “my bad”. When I boast in the LORD; I sing His praises and I glorify Him.
3. Prioritize. Ask your husband what areas he finds most important. If it is the bathrooms, then put that at the top and bottom of your list (so that most of the work is done in the morning and you can touch it up in the evening before he gets home). After your husband's priorities, write yours. I like to do the top 3 for each person. If nothing else gets done, try to do the top 3. This goes for schooling the kids too. Do your kids do better in the morning or in the afternoon? Do you start strong and then fizzle? Write down your school priorities and work from the top down.
Large Ruffle & Leggings: V0000, B60 & 0
Temperature: 95 degrees
So what does a girl do?
My childhood's earliest thoughts are linked with thee;
We are headed to our first race of the season....as a family....in the rain! It's not just sprinkling either....it's a full on downpour right now!
The intent of the TSA was to:
Ariela had oiled the hinges of the door the night before. The day’s openings and closings had worked the oil down onto the old pins so that now the door opened with barely a complaint. As Ariela stepped inside the building, she quickly scanned the sleeping shapes. The mother and father were in one corner. The three children occupied the other three corners.
*This is amazing. They do not mention even once that the guy's body "disappeared probably as a result of snacking". They don't even mention gators but the once in a safety kinda way.
The dining area is a haphazard collection of stools, chairs and tables with booth seating along one wall. A couple of barrels pass for tables in one section, and we spy a large table with tea lights cosily tucked into a wall recess in the back corner. Beneath the entrance stairs is the stockroom, a locked cage of wine bottles with a pint-sized entrance that forces bar star to bend themselves in half just to enter.
When I'm not working on Saturday (or the occasional Sunday), I'm running off doing something else. I'm not really sure what that something else has been, but I promise you that I've been running around doing something.
My prayers go up and my
Est teneüre vraiement
2011 will be widely celebrated as the 400th anniversary of the ‘King James Bible’, the ‘Authorized Version . . . Appointed to be Read in Churches’. Both Cambridge University Press and its Oxford counterpart (and doubtless many other publishers) will be publishing commemorative works on the history of the translation, its reception, its influence on the development of the English language, and its continuing relevance.
So, the day after New Years, we're on a trip that takes us from home base, to Music City, to City of the Rising Dead Bird, then south of the border, WAY south, to Honduras, sit for a while and then bring them back. Supposed to have been 8 days on the road, most of that outside of the US.
Oh bloody hell. Erm… I actually cannot remember one book that I read last year. I have a horrible feeling I only re-read things. Ooh, no, I read A Spot of Bother, the new Mark “Curious Incident” Haddon, and that was utterly brill. (phew) Before you sneer at me, I read at least a few pages of approximately 300 books, thanks to my history degree. But they don’t count. I did love On Royal and Papal Power by John of Paris, but that’s a bit wanky, isn’t it? Oh, and Deathly Hallows, I spose, which I did love a lot. And Going Postal, by Terry Pratchett, which is just lovely.
But then I remember that these are my girls. They’re polite and they’re quiet. The girls take turns hopping onto the chair, watching me and then moving over so that another interested hen can see.
Well everyone here it is, our final post on the Stamp Something blog(sniff). To everyone who has every played along, sponsored a challenge or been a DT member.....THANK YOU!! We've had such an amazing three years and couldn't have done it without YOU!! See you all in blogland.
Q: when we ask you why you don’t have testimonials you are allways evasive. Can you tell us why?
#4 – We are becoming political and neglecting the prophetic.
Body Bling Cosmetics Pink pigment – Applied to the center of my eyes and above the crease, into my brow bone.
all the "kids" ready to go:
Inside the box are 6 love notes that you can give the entire box to someone that you love filled with notes of love and appreciation (they would also be cute stuck in lunchboxes)! The small heart is another Lockhart stamp called "IB Rosebud Heart" that I stamped on each love note & colored with Copics. All those sparkles are from my Smooch Spritz in vanilla (I told ya I loved that stuff)!
But there's a respite, a seat about a third of the way up, dedicated to a man who fished from this bay for forty years, there are a lot of easier places to fish from, I think, but up and down that cliff every day must have either kept him very fit, or killed him.
He's crying because I set him down on a bench to eat his snack. He wanted to be held while he ate his snack instead. Not sitting down, he wanted Mama standing. Reminds me of how picky he was about me standing and holding him when he was an infant. Poor kid. It was mid-morning which is usually his best time of day but he was so so tired.
It was a bit tough deciding what to do, the novelty of it and the many possibilities making me euphoric (a videogame? A comic? Oh, how about radio plays?) but I ended up choosing to script a story that I had on my mind for a while in graphic novel format.
Today, at the age of 32, I got dressed for work and threw on some jewelry. I typically wear the same cross necklace, cross ring and earrings that my husband has given my over the years, all of them silver. Today I threw on some bangles and some fan shaped earrings as I ran out the door. While sitting here working I realized that I like wearing different jewelry and should do it more often. In fact, I like what I have on and this surprises me because it’s gold. I never thought I would like gold, and have been swearing it off for as long as I can remember.
Remember in the film matrix reloaded – what the merovingian says, “How can you ever have time unless you make time?” same applies, you make time for you job, partner, kids, TV, friends but what about you?
The walk started fine.
Suki was in the furthest point of her field, putting her as far from the agte as possible. As usual I called to her as I passed and she raised her head in response. I only had time for a quick check because I had Isaiah in the car and there was a baseball game that night. My place when slower than usual, though because Michael was coming home with a new kitten and we wanted it secured in the guest room before Isaiah went in the house. One look at that kitten and there would be no way to convince Isaiah to go to the game!
Flipped over, he entered her from the back. Pulling her shoulder to bring her in closer as he continued the long deep strokes only stopping to taste her pussy and greedily drink her satisfaction. Her body was wild with excitement as orgasms came and went like friend passing in the night. The sounds of the streets played in the distance as the moans of their love sung out a slow sultry serenade. Wiping sweat from his brow, he grabbed her breast and brought her nearer with each stroke. With each meeting of their flesh they felt as one, and with each union a fit of passion tingled inside of her. Pulling out he brought his tongue from the top of her curvaceous ass to the bottom of her pussy. Then he lay down on the cover and watched her as she straddled over him, grinding on his dick slowly as they writhed with pleasure. Contorted, their bodies were locked in each other as the moon and stars shun down fully aware that love like this could create its own galaxy and as her cum ran down his dick, she put one hand on his chest and one hand on her own and then without warning she began to scream. Grinding herself into him, they came. Frozen in their own tantric pose, they fell into each other once more. Caressed by the breeze of a beautiful Harlem night, they were more aware than ever that this city and this love needed their protection and with a bond as strong as theirs, if only for a blink of God’s eye Harlem would be okay.
I can certainly try. What seems to be the problem?
Each day has literally been a new adventure. We joke that each day feels like a week, yet somehow, by the end of the week, we can’t believe it’s over. The best way I can think to convey to you my week is to give you little snapshots of my adventures. It may drive some of you crazy that it’s not chronological, but hey, let’s mix it up a bit.
There are times in life when you feel like headbanging until your head falls off and running round in a circle really really quickly. When there’s a new Magnum album, however, is not one of those times. Bob Catley is back at the front with another album from the revitalised unsung heroes of British pomp rock.
Need a quick and easy (and inexpensive) gift idea for the last few days before Christmas? Ceramic tile coasters aren't a new idea, but still worthy of the reminder. And dictionary art is growing in poularity so I've combined the two.
After the nailbiting, foot stomping, table drumming game that ended 3:1 Argentina, we stepped out onto the wet streets covered in confetti to the tunes of a million different cars all honking to the same tune! When I emerged from my Subte stop on Juramento and Cabildo I was utterly enveloped by this enormous crowd who'd literally run out into the middle of this busy intersection and stopped all traffic to celebrate. Jumping and drumming and dancing and clapping and waving flags! Viejos and chiquitos alike, everyone singing the same fight songs, and shouting the same chants, all with accompanying dance moves and hand gestures! The police even showed up, but instead of breaking up the fun and dispelling the hoards of revellers, they simply diverted the traffic so it could continue! And this was already hours after the game had ended! I haven't checked but I'm pretty sure they're still there!
Anyway, the focus of the book is mostly on Anne. She spends some time volunteering in a camp-thing for migrant workers, sees how horrible their lives are, and decides she wants to devote her life to making their lives better. By becoming a nun. In the process, she totally ignores her friends and their problems. Because life only sucks for really poor people. Yeah, I'm sounding extremely insensitive to the plight of the poor migrant workers. Oh, well.
If my spirit were a song, what would it sound like?
I think you might be surprised...
Around the world, America is watched closely and what happens here is news everywhere else. This is particularly true in the Middle East when America, following 9/11, invaded Afghanistan to drive out the Taliban and al Qaeda, and then invaded Iraq to remove a regional destabilizing figure, Saddam Hussein. And, of course, America has long been an ally of Israel through several wars perpetrated against it by Arab nations and, lately, the Iranian proxies, Hezbollah and Hamas.
Cast: Laurence Olivier, Claire Bloom, Maggie Smith, Burgess Meredith Dir: Desmond Davis C-118 mins, TV-14
printed off words, name, whatever you want to put in your frame
Adding links to websites, adding links to social media, adding links to twitter. Just add them. Even if you are linking back to your website, your blog, Facebook, at the bottom of the content you are linking, make sure to link your purchase sites, your other social media sites or you primary website.
Yesterday our local FCC chapter held their Chinese New Year party. Instead of going down to a restaurant in Miami like we've done in years past, we changed it up a bit. Well, quite a bit to be honest. We had a picnic for our members complete with a bounce house, catered food, balloon artistry, &, of course, the infamous lion dancers.
Bram Stoker’s Dracula (1992)
When I got back into collecting five or so years ago one of the things that excited me was the availability of autographed cards. Perhaps I went a little overboard but I think I picked up some nice cards. This will be an A-Z series of posts with varying numbers of cards.
I am in love!
Let me start by saying that, for a long time, I felt, yet again, out of place in this world knowing that I have always been a Night Owl. Even in grade school, I liked to stay up late and sleep late. In doing a smidge of googling on the subject, though, I find that it's not so abnormal. What I find unfortunate for those of us who are Night Owls is that society and our jobs often dictate what kind of schedule we must maintain.
it was lovely, until i was wakened by the neighbors loud obnoxious dogs...they have about 8 of them and anytime a car drives by they go berserk!!
I'm going hunting...hunting for a man. This particular type I'm hunting for today is not as elusive as once suggested and are in fact abundant during September through January. I'm hunting for the Football Head.
After three years of a terrible economy, I think even the most hardcore Republican would have to admit that President Obama knows something about the blues.
(This is an opportunity for you to ask some questions and to share your thoughts) Parents: As you’re driving in the car somewhere with your family play this game. Think of things you’re sure will happen each day. For each thing you think of, have your child think of something he or she believes about God. For example, you might say that the sun will set tonight or that you will go to work tomorrow. Your child might say, “God loves me” or “Jesus lives in heaven”. Talk about the certainty of each statement and what it means to have faith in God.
05. Life Saver 5:37
Happy Saturday!!! We are officially on Easter break. The kiddos finished school @ midday yesterday and they are out until April 16th. No school runs, no uniforms, no lunches.. *happy sigh*. Let's hope the weather cooperates so that they can get outside to play! Summer came and went in 3 days this week - it went from 22C on Tuesday down to 9C today, lol.
Best Amateur Vanilla - Laura Kooris
on the traditional hot dogs, hamburgers and chicken wings.
1284 D-XI/8/1997. “Euripides’ Bacchae and the Decline of the Classical World.” Staff Seminar, The Basic Program of Liberal Education for Adults, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
That soon your face will fade away
This weeks challenge is just for fun - but if you enter into each challenge for the entire month you will be entered into a random drawing for a Sweet Pea Gift Card!
Consciousness is the arm of the point that incarnates the line in the hyperbola
Happy hump day!
3. I got to babysit Simon!
‘I watched young Muslims at the Finsbury Park mosque in London in the late 1990s being prepared for journeys to military camps. Money was raised for their air fares by selling books and films in stalls at the mosques.’
or maybe it’s better that way.
We began with yellowtail sashimi with Korean red pepper sauce (possibly my most favorite condiment). The tuna was delicious and fresh and the pepper sauce was combination I’ve never had before. But I love it!
till he cried out in his anger and his shame
websites, digitized information related to project progress is encouraged and may be used for development purposes by ASA or ALC.
Mr. Henry Nastie was played by me, Mike Brady of Baby Milk Action. Other people interviewed were campaign supporters who had come to demonstrate at Nestlé (UK) HQ
The Two Kinds of Religious People
Another problem that the race struggles to deal with is the speed that the herd attack the first.
A beautiful September day was interrupted by a horrid act of terrorism. I remember our principal at Lake Stevens High School getting on the loud-speaker announcing there had been a terrorist attack in New York, and that none of us were to leave school. We were in lock-down until further notice. We spent our class time watching the news, watching all the terror unfold. I remember everyone looking so somber, no one knew what to say. We just stared silently at the TV until we were released for the end of the day.
Afterward, a group of us (Cyn, Sean Petrie, Jenny Moss, P.J. Hoover, Nikki Loftin, Samantha Clark, Lindsey Scheibe, Bethany Hegedus, Jordan Dane, Mari Mancusi, and Rosemary Clement-Moore) headed over to Frank & Angie's for a late dinner and a glass of wine or two. Discussion ranged from TV shows (Buffy, Dr. Who, Supernatural, Firefly, Battlestar Galactica); books not written by any of us (Hunger Games, Dragon's Tooth, The Watch That Ends the Night, The Future of Us, The Fox Inheritance), and Texas's Old Three Hundred.
The caregiver asked if she needed breakfast. Well, duh. Of course she did! It had been a whole 10 minutes since she had last eaten! She was starving! Wasting away. She was given a plate of waffles (already cut up, oh well) and chipped peaches. And a fork. She was in heaven. Bliss. More happy kicky feet action. She didn’t even notice me leaving.
It's been forever since I've was in Bali and returned to Paris. Since end of April in fact. Don't know what happened here. Time seems to have just evaporated, like it tends to do. The year has been busy with several events, private dinners, cooking lessons and the such, but also with lots of visitors.
Prosecutors argued that Johnstone deserved jail, saying his misconduct tainted the police department and threw into question hundreds of arrests and convictions. According to the New York Daily News, the Brooklyn district attorney's office was forced to dismiss 270 drug cases in the wake of the scandal.
People: Amen.
Suckers.
Acts 27:4, Part 1
5:40AM.
2 Ain't Even Close 4:30
“It is only proper that a court of law determines the cause of death and matters related thereto,” he said in a statement.
Discs five and six round up the goodies from their final glory days, opening with 1969's Got A Line On You (which by '72 would become Exile's finale Shine A Light, why wasn't this on the Exile box?). Of course Cocksucker Blues is here as well as the version of Brown Sugar with Clapton on slide, alternates of Wild Horses, Sway (no strings, different guitar solo) and Bitch. The highlights for me on disc five are the alternate versions of Exile's two covers'-- Robert Johnson's Stop Breaking Down (different vocals and slide guitar, no harmonica) and Slim Harpo's Shake Your Hips (a completely different version) and Who Am I?, again, these should have made it to the Exile deluxe package. There's also a nice alternate take of Dead Flowers (Suzie started life as Lucy in the lyric), probably their best country song ever (unless I'm Movin' On from the Got Live If You Want It EP counts).
When purchased separately, these ebooks are worth $375, but for four days only, you can purchase the entire collection for just $29! Click here to view more details!
On the loom front, it has arrived! She's now called Millicent (aptly meaning hard worker) and was taken to pieces and put together again in our top room. She is a 4 shaft counterbalance floor loom, made locally in the 1970s from solid beams of mahogany. I spent the day on Sunday cleaning her up and linseed oiling her, and she now looks a beauty. Hopefully, if my yarn arrives on time I will be threading her up and starting to weave some samples later this week... hoorah!
at hand. The cats passed through her lap and legs
“Glory to God in highest heaven,
04.Ode to Larry Joe
A job seeker must be able to adapt and correct mistakes. During my phone interview, I didn't think I did a great job. However, I promised myself that if I got a call for a second interview, I would knock it out of the park. So, I examined areas where I felt I performed poorly and I made the appropriate adjustments. I pinpointed things that I either forgot or neglected to articulate during the first interview, and I ensured those specific things were mentioned during the second. Another mistake: I forgot my resume during my second interview. The correction: I drove back the next business day with my resume, references, and thank-you note in hand. The secretary from human resources emailed the next day and said the team was impressed.
Put the stack back together with the white sheet in the middle...
so I had to dig it up!
Thus all Vedic literature is documented and all of it is placed on a historical timeline. Yes, the concepts within this literature are timeless, but the literature which expressed and expanded those timeless ideas all have a particular place on a historical timeline.
He was appointed Chairman of the General Advisory Committee to the Atomic Energy Commission after it was formed in 1947. It was from this position that Oppenheimer began lobbying for international arms control in addition to his responsibilities for advising on nuclear issues and other areas such as funding and the building of laboratories.
If all the facts are accurate, then this case is a typical example of a crime-scene gone horribly wrong!
In a food processor: to make the crust, combine the flour, sugar, hazelnuts, and salt and pulse 2-3 times to mix. Add the butter and pulse 8-10 times until the mixture forms large, coarse crumbs the size of small peas.
As I stood there alone, watching as best I could, a Dutch man came up and tried to make conversation. He said something to me in Dutch, to which I replied with apologetic shrug - ”I’m sorry, I don’t speak Dutch.”
Home today- placed a second order for astragulus, calendula, dandelion.. Really wanted white sage as well but they were out :/
Parents don’t come with instruction booklets. They learn as they go, just as we all do in life.
Famous Rouge Allure lipstick is a nice red to explore. I love the formula and the lipstick glides on smoothly. I wasn't particularly blown away by the shade but it is great for those who are generally afraid of reds.
Women’s Fashion Watch – Way to Show Your Elegance
Mr Zephaniah, who now lives in East Anglia, said the beneficiaries of slavery must make some restitution. “I don’t think slave money can be paid back to individual families – I know that my family suffered from slavery, but to actually identify who took us from Africa would be impossible.
As we were leaving The Preacher said we should do this again some time. She doesn’t like for me to tell this, but the next two times I asked her out she said ‘No’! Fortunately I inherited some Irish persistence from both my parents and asked her out for a third time. I must have worn down her resistance, because she said ‘Yes’ that third time.
In this botanical wonderland east of the Himalayas, in China’s southwest Yunnan province, David had a consultation with the famous village healer, Dr. Ho, a figure of great cross-cultural interest. “I was raised by Christian missionaries,” Ho told the Daily Telegraph, (in one of many news stories). “But there were many other religions, too – Muslim, Buddhism, Confucianism and Naxi.”
Once your water is hot enough, add the vinegar and with a large wooden or slotted spoon swirl the water in a circle making a circular whirlpool like effect. Slowly drop your egg into the water and cook for about 3 minutes. Remove with slotted spoon. Repeat with remaining eggs.
- one Carried on the shoulder Comfortable
OURS. It seems there is more space now for Sam to Shine, because Jake is just
Grate the carrots finely and mash the banana with a fork. Mix to make a dough with the flour, rolled oats and oil. If necessary, add a little water.
As every following hopper approached the finish the crowd grew louder with cheers of encouragement, some were struggling however crossing the line was an achievement. As the last person crossed the line, having completed the course in fancy dress there was some relief. The winners received medals to congratulate them and their winning legs from Palin and Jones.
You may Gulp or go on to Swallow
Before American military presence in Afghanistan there was thousands of Osama bin Ladens willing to take up the reigns of leadership for al-Qaeda or the Taliban. Today there are millions. When the British “won the hearts and minds” of the Malayan people during the Malayan Emergency, there must have been a mutual respect for people’s culture and values. Clearly the Americans in Afghanistan are not demanding any respect. Instead they have a similar double standard in their application of justice that they apply to majorities in America, albeit inversed. Apparently Afghans have destroyed Korans in Afghanistan before without any consequence.
April 19, 2010 — Judge Stan Strickland steps down after Casey Anthony’s defense team files a motion accusing him of having inappropriate conversations with a pro-prosecution blogger. Strickland granted the motion because the accusation would “generate renewed allegations of bias”. Judge Belvin Perry, Jr. is appointed to take over the case.
The author(s) make no reference to the importance of therapeutic rapport that has also been associated with client outcomes in the literature. This is a serious oversight in a discussion on clinical training and practice.
This time around I'll be talking about my NEW bedroom. It used to be called the Horse Room and was a catch-all space of things and clothes we didn't use much. Half the walls were beige and the other half a dark maroon, with a border of horses separating the two (see picture below). The "noose" you see hanging down is actually the pull to the ceiling fan, though mama used to think that the state of that room sometimes was cluttered enough to make her want to hang herself ;)
Becky’s dedication and passion hasn’t gone unnoticed by the Foundation supporters either. At last year’s Saving Grace Gala, Becky was named Volunteer of the Year for her dedication to our mission. Although honored to be recognized by the Foundation, Becky’s hope for this year’s walk and the coming years is for more local recognition and participation by the medical community.
Honest, I'm excited about it. I watch Sheba and Remy run and play in the backyard, powerful and elegant and quite frankly goofy as hell sometime. That's part of the fun, too. Watching them soar around the back yard like rockets then just as suddenly stopping to try and snap a fly out of the air to eat. Yes, eat. I'm just wondering what it's going to be like when there's a whole giant pack of them. Like fifteen. Oh my headache just got worse.
We all know I’m not adverse to that.
Do check with a skewer , if inserted in centre comes out clean , its done.
Instead, he called. And I emailed. He drove out to see me. I agreed to run sound for the musical he was stage managing. We went to concerts. We watched movies. We held hands. We kissed in the driveway of his ex-girlfriend's house. And at the beach. And in the lake. And at concerts. And at the movies.
Tristan & Carissa headed off and then Tamazin came back in. Shaun's lunch arrived and he had some before it was time to leave for a couple of hours...rest time (rules....11 - 1). I went to the cafe and Tam went to friends. Several friends joined me at the cafe, firstly Rick & Anne with their girls, the Denis & Marilyn, who also came up to see Shaun briefly. It was amazing to see how much more he had improved just in 2 hours. He was more evenly coloured, brighter, more awake and doing well.
Create something mostly green on your card/project OR recycle something on you card/project in remembrance of the nature God has created for us!!
Quotations from Chairman Mao Tse-Tung – 820
Wikipedia
According to his wife Hannah, he had been complaining of allergies and head congestion while traveling to Denver for a three-day Touring Pro event before waking up yesterday in the early morning hours with severe stomach pains.
A couple of times now, I've met up with a group here in Hong Kong called "Special Needs Network". Basically, it's a group of mums who have kids with special needs. When I go, sometimes I feel blessed that Maddy "only" has dwarfism. Some of their kids have much "worse" disabilities and will dependent their entire life. I've felt a bit out of place at times, but these mums have some great resources regarding mainstream schooling, medical services, therapies etc and I know that they have some answers to questions that I have, or that I may have in the future.
However, things changed when I started writing. It started off slow, like catching more errors than I did previously, to finally getting to the point that I books I'd previously read and loved, i couldn't read any more because I couldn't just read for entertainment anymore. I'd see every error. Every plot hole. Every missing comma. So, now, I find it very hard to find books that are so good that I'm able to turn off my internal editor. Which, has of course, really brought down the amount of reading I do.
I thought it was time to share a little
Building the habit is essential, otherwise it’s never going to happen… unless you are one of those sporadic geniuses who can disappear for six weeks and reemerge with a hangover and a great manuscript. Sometimes I pretend I am one of those people, just because I like the fantasy of locking myself in an attic loft overlooking White Rock beach, drinking whiskey and smoking cigarettes (I don’t smoke Mom, don’t faint!) in a Hemingway-esque, wanton sacrifice of my life-force to The Arts. But I ain’t Hemingway. No-sir. I’m that person who sits on the side of the creative process, wringing his/her hands, saying “Nyaa…. that water looks cold! What is that?! An eddy? A riptide? Jimminy Cricket, I ain’t goin’ in there!”
After being rushed to hospital she said, ‘My face is a prison to me’, while her distraught young son said at the time, ‘This is not my mother’.
Feel empty life without your beauty.
There are some important doors that are opening up for you right now. Keep your unwavering thoughts, feelings, and actions focused on what you want to accomplish at this time. Focused intention and affirmations are powerful tools for you to use in creating the life you want for yourself. Set a plan and stick to it (not a time table). Visualize daily what your life looks and feels like when you reach those goals. Trust in the divine timing of all things and that you are worthy and deserving. This most often is the greatest challenge in deliberate creating. This is the perfect time for you to start new projects (or course, be sure to finish the old ones first). New ideas and situations are coming your way through the vibrational energy that you have been sending out. Keep sending out rockets of desire that match your plans.
Having witnessed one of Belloc's pyrotechnic displays at the Oxford Union, Baring described him as "a brilliant orator and conversationalist… who lives by his wits." At their first meeting, Belloc confronted Baring's agnostic arguments with the uncompromising riposte that he would "most certainly go to hell." Evidently finding Belloc's dogmatic belief more tolerable than the dogmatic disbelief of Bertrand Russell's intellectual coterie in Cambridge, Baring concluded from "the first moment I saw him" that Belloc was "a remarkable man."
"The men who executed this mission accepted this risk, practiced to minimize those risks, and understood the importance of the target to the national security of the United States," he said. "This operation was a surgical raid by a small team designed to minimize collateral damage and to pose as little risk as possible to noncombatants on the compound or to Pakistani civilians in the neighborhood."
And to Jesus the mediator of the new covenant, and to the blood of sprinkling, that speaketh better things than that of Abel. Hebrews 12:24 (KJV)
Well, there are three possibilities. It could be a corruption of ale – at least one source actually does explicitly say that Englisch Oel is a corruption or misspelling of Ale. It could also simply be a re-use of the same word that was being used for other export beer.
extracts from the Split Gill, Turkey Tail and Reishi mushrooms. In 1998, Maitake Products received FDA approval for an Investigational New Drug Phase II pilot study of Maitake mushroom extract in the treatment of advanced breast and prostate cancer. There is also some evidence that the consumption of mushrooms in the diet may ward off cancer.
If this were a soccer match I think Spain would easily have the advantage, but rock? The odds gotta be with the Danish...well...except these are some damn fine Spanish bands.
They were all disappointed that this didn’t work. Luckily I had a bunch of glow sticks laying around the house. I brought a bunch of those and we cut them open and put them into our bogus Mountain Dew concoction. So did we end up with Glow in the Dark Mountain Dew but we cheated to get there. (Guess we shouldn’t have cheated when you are trying to teach about honesty and integrity).
Alaska
Sigh, I love my fiancé and this will all get worked out and I have faith that the right kilt will be worn on our special day no matter what it looks like or what name it is associated with. So I’m going to go to bed now. Nothing more can be decided tonight.
beautiful flowers with some cute painted bird houses
The spirit is distilled from grapes. Making it technically a brandy. It reminds me of a fine grappa. Nothing wrong with that.
I LOATHE TEXAS SUMMERS!
Thanks for stopping by, and I hope you like the card and are inspired to create something today! Big hugs to all!
In the last few years, I’ve started to invest a bit more in higher quality wardrobe items, but I still go for the affordable when purchasing trendy items such as this cotton blue leopard print top. I got it for only $15 at Deb!
Gathered on my search for meaning
In the end, I came up with the idea to experiment with healthy crackers. I can use these to add crunch, whole grains and fiber to my afternoon snack, and pair it with a lot of different things, like dips and cheese and peanut butter.
For reasons that I will write about some day, recently groups of guys have been tromping through our house. Guys whose boots and jeans are redolent of their own Labs and Shepherds and Pit Bulls. Guys--the most dangerous kind, for training purposes--who like dogs. Before they arrive, I put Wolfie's collar and leash on him. When the guys knock on the door, I tell him "Down! Stay!" And when they walk in I say, "I'm the dog trainer." They understand. I tell Wolfie "O.k." and let him greet for about ten seconds, then put him back on stay, and there he lies, as the guys wander through every inch of the house, often stepping over him to peer at some window or wall.
What if their business goes down or their job is downsized?
I'm just wearing Urban Decay 24/7 Lip Liner in Ozone (clear) and an old school red Revlon Lip Stain underneath. On the cheeks I'm wearing Essence Sun Club Matt Bronzing Powder for Blondes/Lighter Skin in 01 Natural and Sportsgirl Glow & Behold Illuminating Bronzer to highlight.
Park and Recreations Department
B52
Jintan: Ugh!
**edited to note that I’ve only ever tried cannabis when I was young and foolish
(The ugly patch will be taped to my face to be removed only to add eye drops.)
It’s brilliant because it’s Shakespearean in its themes.
As Ruby's daughter Melody said in her speech, Ruby's is still not going down without making some noise. Please sign the petition if you haven't and pass it on to anyone you may know. Ruby's and all the evicted businesses are important parts of the flavor of Coney Island and we can't just let C.I become another mall without a fight.
Dessie Hughes IRE (Curragh, County Kildare)
Kiyoshi Suzuki, Producer
But for one moment there, I saw a little bit of New York....more walk and less talk.
Head coach Dennis Pursley identified the breakthrough of younger swimmers as the most positive aspect of the competition.
To make this, you just have to cut the pork belly into small pieces. Then, arrange it in the airfryer basket. Fry it under 180 deg C for about 15 minutes or more (depends on the size of the pork belly). The pork belly is now turned into golden brown pork lard, like this.......Next, you can use it to garnish your dish or to delish up your fried noodle.
A bit later came round and I found myself at the cinema with friends seeing the film version first. There's a twist and the book and film deal with the twist very differently, but appropriately for their medium. I did see the twist coming in the film and if I had read the book first, would not have done and the book dealt with it so perfectly, simply, abruptly. I cry at a lot of romantic films but I properly cried from the twist to the end. I was pretty distraught as the end and needed a minute.
Stuart Mackay, Independent. Infoese
The treaty, largely agreed last December, gives a greater role to the European Commission in making sure national budgets meet the rules and allows the European Court of Justice to monitor compliance.
A man with murky motives and background (Steffan) worms his way into a gang of outlaws in search of information about one of their previous raids. Things become dangerously complicated when he discovers the outlaws are planning a raid on a local ranch owned by the one man who knows his true identity.
Chef annoyed me at dinner, admittedly. I know he has a tough schedule, the man works almost every single weekend. A few weeks ago, however, we talked about how I was sad that he wouldn’t be able to go to my family’s lake place. During the summer, my family goes there every weekend. It’s pretty important to me that the guy I’m with long-term will be able to partake in that. During our conversation, I told Chef about Halloween weekend at the lake, which is the last weekend the campground is open until next spring. It’s not actually Halloween, but the weekend before. He then stated to me, so emphatically that it made my heart hurt (in a good way), that he would be there that weekend. He would make it work. He knew it was important to me. Major points to Chef.
I realized that I had a choice: either I could on the edge of the seat and anxiously watch the kilometers tick by on the odometer, or I could sit back and enjoy the view of the star-studded night sky because this guy would drive us as far as we needed to go.
diced avocado
A further statement will be issued when more details about the incident are confirmed.
A young man was planning to get married
For those of you too young to remember, James Garner was the Robert Pattinson of his generation. He shared the screen with everyone from Doris Day (Thrill of It All and Move Over Darling), Steve McQueen (The Great Escape), Julie Andrews (Victor, Victoria) and enjoyed a long run on the small screen in Maverick and The Rockford Files. Devastatingly handsome, he was and is one of the nicest people in Hollywood. His bio is available on Amazon.
Please feel free to leave your thoughts below.
Uk consumers are generally alert pertaining to exactly what mobile phones people really should take. Intellect some sort of Country model’s phone in addition to see the attributes connected with their own phone. Most of these persons certainly not wish to hold a was involved with phone. For anyone who is definitely not involving most of these persons, subsequently you may become these individuals. Seek to get some sort of Usa most current Nokia Phone Cellular phone in addition to be onward on the relax. Nokia generally produces different smartphones from the transmission current market. Just about every of that solutions is definitely rather unique by reviewing the preceding solutions. In addition to advertising uncomplicated mobile phones, furthermore, it provides clever phone. Whatsoever total connected with dollars you fork out for virtually every Nokia phone would be the suitable solution intended for the appropriate dollars.
YOU have a simple choice to make, be kept occupied with pie-in-the-sky dreams and get killed in the meantime, get killed along the way, or wake up and take charge of your situation NOW, where you are NOW, here in the land of REALITY.
If you don't sew down your applique (by hand or by machine) some fraying will occur. I happen to like that look. :) I've also realized you can touch up the appliques with a hot iron if sections seem to lift up. This is great to know if your sewing skills are lacking like mine! I can sew straight lines...but curves are not so pretty! I did make a fleur de lis for a tote bag and practiced sewing on it. It looks terrible! Why did I choose to practice on an applique with so many curves? Is there some secret to sewing small curves? Please tell me there is some super cool secret that I'm not aware of! Otherwise, I guess I'll have to find some time to spend at my machine and figure it out.
This malady is pretty unique to knitters since there aren't many projects in sewing that require making two of the same thing in order to have one complete set. But perhaps I should have known this might be a problem for me given how rarely I repeat sewing patterns. For me, figuring out all the ins-and-outs of a new pattern is half the fun. Look how long it took me to sew up the third boxers I'd cut for Phin. And I don't have any patterns I'd consider to be TNT's.
The set up is this. Workers are feared and mistrusted. Society has developed charms of protection and as workers can only do their work through the touch of their fingers everyone in society wears gloves. The practice of curse work is outlawed so it’s gone underground. It’s the criminal families that recruit and use curse workers, to be a worker is synonymous to being a member of the Mafia.
I am not advocating this paradox to be completely resolved, since I feel there are films where the explicitly “life like” character of the film is relevant for its reception. For example in documentary films that advocate a concrete cause. However I think it is necessary to also approach the documentary genre as an art form in becoming, so that the established notions would not predetermine all possible developments. To provide an example I am posting one of my old time favorites – Peter Greenaway’s short film H is for House. It is an example that in my view manages to go beyond the established notions of documentary form, initiating a distinct film-thinking
I hope that this has been helpful. Remember that all the information above is up-to-date as of 5/5/2011. But things here seem to be able change often -- especially price increases.
after much searching for inspiration for our guest room we finished the little project. this was honestly one of the easiest, inexpensive art project I've done. but first, let me show you the room.
F: I think so, yes.
You can read the rest of the review here. I’m in the minority here in the theater world; LaBute is still quite the popular figure. Chris Jones loves him (although I think Jones and I have had opposite reactions to every single play we’ve both happened to review, so that’s not too surprising).
The only thing to remember when making this is not to scoop all the way until you feel the skin of the avocados when you take out the flesh with a spoon. The layer closest to the skin will be bitter, and you will taste that in the cake if you include it.
4. Place the couscous strainer over a large bowl (if you are going to serve it immediately, use a metal bowl or place the strainer over a large piece of foil) and with a large serving spoon, spoon some of the dough into the sieve and run the spoon over the dough, pushing it through the strainer. You can also use your hand to get it through the strainer, but the dough is hot… Do not force any hard bits through – just throw them away.
It turned out to be a fortuitous mistake. The cocoa added to the flavor.
She stood up straight and headed down the path to her home, sure she had made the right decision. The walk seemed much longer than usual and she was afraid it would be dark before she got there. She knew her mother, the Queen, would punish her for being late. "She is SO mean." She shivered, "Why is it getting so cold? Maybe it's going to rain." She walked faster, hoping she wouldn't get wet.
Wright said the warm weather came so early growers were worried the blossoms would get hit by frost. At 4:30 a.m. Sunday morning the temperature at Wright’s farm bottomed out at about -3 C. He said at -3.9 degrees researchers estimate there will be 90 per cent bud kill.
You are not attempting to be a manager, or even a businessman. You are concerned with the getting of money. You must go with your gut. After that, the managers and the bean counters and financial advisors can take over. But only afterwards.
First, he Borg are as menacing as they were back in "The Best of Both Worlds.” It is tough following up a story that well done with another Borg invasion story, but First Contact does it well by introducing a much more claustrophobic feel. Whereas we were fretting over the inevitable assimilation of Earth on a grand scale in “The Best of Both Worlds,” it is the mindless zombie attacks of individual drones in the confined space of the Enterprise that ratchets up the attention--apart from the personal plight of Picard, of course. It is masterful that one can take essentially the same plot and make it frightening twice.
First of all, I got a really cool bulging forearm muscle from scooping hard ice cream. And secondly, I got to eat delicious ice cream every day, which is basically a dream come true.
And finishing up our exciting day with ice cream! Twelve of the kids ordered Blue Moon, by far the most popular flavor. We also had four individuals who ordered vanilla, chocolate, cookies and cream, and cookie dough. As usual, the ice cream was delicious.
I love walking and raising money to support those people.
I was overwhelmed as this was a big surprise – when I arrived to the restaurant people yelled “SURPRISE!”, and I was thinking – today is not my birthday, I have not won anything,… what’s going on? The room was full of both familiar faces and faces that I didn’t know (but now I do have the pleasure of knowing them, of course) all of them saying “THANK YOU!”. Gratitude is a strange word in our life, we hardly ever use it. We live day-by-day too fast, and when we remember it is night again.
Let's face it. Most do-good exercises have failed. Communism, loosely defined as a caring-sharing economic system where everyone contributes what they can and gets back what they need, was an unmitigated disaster with untold human consequences. Even Nationalism, or national-socialism, which claimed to care about all members of the Fatherland family, only did so by eradicating anyone who didn't fit the profile.
WHY YOU HAVE TO WEIGH YOUR OILS
"Hanae Mori Parfums is a line of fine fragrances, beauty and grooming products from Paris for women and men of discernment worldwide.
I haven’t felt like I’ve raised much awareness today, been on the phone for much of it but things have been achieved today!
That's what being a mercenary is, and it's not all candy and roses and "hey I'll drive a trunk for 100K and come home smelling like the desert."
We accept cash or checks only
His bail was set at $45,000, no 10-percent option, on Wall’s charges, and was lodged at Monmouth County Correctional Institution in default.
Congratulations, Mom, you did it! I love you! You should be proud of yourself!
She could not get her tools to work properly so she sent me to a different area of the clinic where they could try to get some tests done with proper specialty equipment.
Have fun and thanx, M, (*_*)
No, it can’t be so simple as that…
This quote is a metaphor because the world is not literally a stage. By saying that the world is a stage, Shakespeare makes a comparison between the world and a stage to give an understanding about how the world and the people in it work
Probably my absolute favorite... I love how the fluffy snow is so delicately covering the Christmas lights.
Paulo and Olivia look at the third stranger, an unshaven man who smells like cigarettes.
Afterwards, Emma and I went to the pub (a Wetherspoons, which I frequent in Falmouth, so it was like home from home). Coming back with drinks, wearing my new jacket, I got a tap on the shoulder. Turning round, I saw a young man (late 20s?) who smiled and said, “I like your coat,” before disappearing in the crowds. I was stunned, and looked at Emma. “He’s old enough to be my SON!” I said.
Z Seawitch & Stephanie (Girl Friday)
two suggested dates you have open in the upcoming months
22. He goes to same school with Sehun, Sulli f (x), Suzy Miss A, and several other artists.
Informed by thoughtful analysis of recent evidence, anthropological breakthroughs, and ongoing fieldwork, Mixtecs, Zapotecs, and Chatinos will add clarity to the debates surrounding ancient Mesoamerican civilizations.
When it came right down it to, I wanted something that represented me more accurately. Yes, I do live in a house with a bunch of boys (when you count the animals, too ;). Yes, I spend a lot of time playing in the dirt with my boys, cleaning dirty fingernails, and reading tractor books. But still and all, I'm a girl's girl. I like pink. I love flowers. And shoes. And this blog is my space, so I wanted it to reflect my personality. And the final product totally does, from the greige colored background (oh greige, how I love thee!) covered in vintage cabbage roses - I'm a freak for vintage stuff, or I as I like to say, I love old crap - to the pink accents, to the shoe header. Ahhh, I feel at home already. I hope you enjoy it too!
Let’s sing with the nature!
Or I can dance
Pastor Kenneth L. Hutcherson pastor of Antioch Bible Church or Redmond WA, is spear heading a movement call "Let's take back the rainbow."
Gregory: you and Rick Santorum are
However, this is the name of a lovely plum tree that grows at the outskirts of our garden and right now produces fruits in the hundreds. For weeks now the bright red plums have been dropping down, covering our lawn, spilling onto a nearby road, while my new family seems quiet oblivious to this fact. I however, who has never "owned" a fruit tree in my life find this as endless source of excitement, even though I am sorry to say most of the fruit will never be used. Except for those few eaten by me.
Meanwhile, once the place was hustling and bustling
Here's hoping I get through tomorrow without barfing or babbling or, even worse, drawing a complete blank and having nothing to say!
16.Butter : 1/2 tbsp
Excessively higher velocity regarding some paint ball makers to set some sort of adversary challenger. Just about all this pouncing results in opportunities to land in a gelatin shell and are probably cost prohibitive for the good paintball gun are no longer officially liable regarding every paintball problem that appears. Which many would certainly declare is acceptable to the good paintball gun a long way and gotten lighter and scaled-down more than the good paintball gun, the good paintball gun a most important reason for this is not worth it, especially since the good paintball gun a slow rate, due to the good paintball gun at commercial paintball locations offer a much cheaper price than if you handle it or drop it from a suburb near Philly I support anything Philly in the good paintball gun. Barrels used for tagging an opposing person. The very first marker produced particularly for that hobby of paintball was invented by Robert G. Shepherd in 1985. Nevertheless, paintball weapons always keep it as being actual as feasible. Without having essentially becoming actual as expected. A realistic paintball rifle to an airsoft weapon, they look like very quality replications.. Although realistic paintball guns. These guns or paintball guns, the good paintball gun of paintball guns, why still use the good paintball gun on your air tank refills to anyone with an empty tank even if they're not field customers.
So all in all I think the book still exceeded the movie, but the movie was really good and I will definitly be seeing the next two in the series! I am finished the second book and the third book will be the next on my list!
"True, true," Tommy agreed. "However, it is amusing, in a sense, that one can profess to be Catholic while disagreeing with parts of Church teaching. While disregarding the pontiff. While supporting same-sex marriage...or abortion. There is such disjunction between their beliefs and their actions, one wonders if they're thinking at all! And how is it possible for them to maintain composure when they make such claims? I believe I would laugh to their faces at such blatant displays of ignorance! Charitably, of course."
you, you will say, keep
Firstly, you must know rarely is this blog written in real time. I backlog posts when I have more free time for busy times like these.
They don’t know the details, but they wish somebody would come in and do something about it.
The Third pillar covers “Provisions on Police and Judicial Co-operation in Criminal Matters.” Which was formerly known as the Justice and Home Affairs pillar before the transfer of policy on asylum, migration and judicial co-operation in civil matters to the Community pillar.
Two hours later, Pod, covered in oil and several years of accumulated lint, determined that the dryer motor was burned out. In the meanwhile, I bribed the kids with 2 bags of microwave popcorn and a viewing of "Curious George" on DVD, promising that we will see that movie over the Thanksgiving holiday.
The disadvantage of the former lies in our need to insist that the lie is the very truth, refusing to accept that its very purpose is to protect us from the reality we dread.
“The latest independent reports estimate the number of birds killed by wind turbines at 100,000 per year. That’s according to a 2007 report from the National Research Council called ‘Environmental Impacts of Wind Energy Projects.’” And that may be a low estimate.
What the conversation should move to is the new reality is that Ai is "free" but he is really only half-free due to the conditions of his release. And this is a concept and reality that’s hard for the media to interest a broad audience in since on the face of it he is "free." Ai's freedom of speech has been essentially nixed, he's not allowed to talk to media about anything meaningful, he's not allowed to tweet or blog, his public voice has essentially been eliminated and that's a travesty not too many media outlets are picking up on. Additionally, Ai's freedom of travel has been significantly curtailed; he's not allowed to leave the country, which is a heavy burden for an artist of his stature. He cannot even leave Beijing without permission. Ai is now so far in debt to China that his labor essentially belongs to the government. So the terms of his bail seem to limit his art practice in very significant ways, not to mention the ordeal of the arrest itself and the fact that the Big Brother government could send him back there at any time for no real reason at all.
- Leapt to her death from sixth floor Rome building earlier this month
1/2 cup of raisins or dried cherries (optional)
I mentioned in a previous post that I was going to spend some time learning about and writing flash fiction. I have written short fiction of various lengths over the years but never fully understood what it was or why. So, only one week into an on-line course, I'm trying out loads of new flashes and furiously reading both the theory and examples of the art and craft. I am so inspired and slowly beginning to get a real feel for it. After years of concentration on long narrative fiction, it's re-teaching me to strip a story to its bones, accentuating the key moments and layering meaning even when not actually writing it down (That's the hardest part.) It's also teaching me to use language more stringently and thoughtfully. Words always count but in flash fiction each one carries a much heavier weight. (And on a more pedestrian level, it's a great medium to mess about with , to fail, discard, try again and develop if things begin to work...
Be in the light of joy and let it surround you, all around and carry you away.
Bottom line…… NOTHING is going to change in this country until we put someone with proven INTEGRITY and CHARACTER in office, someone who cares more about doing what is right than what is politically expedient. Someone who will put America FIRST. Someone who will act in the best interests of Americans and not Lobbyists/Corporations/MIC. And THIS is why Dr. Ron Paul has my vote.
Me: "SON! WHEN WAS THE LAST TIME YOU BATHED?"
About Islam, the less said the better; let it suffice that it belongs in neither boat. It is a basic rule that the louder the clamor of exclusive franchising rights to God and the stiffer the penalty for disbelief, the greater the distance to God. Islam’s distance is the greatest.
11. Sarah Jessica Parker, Kim Cattrall, Kristin Davis, Cynthia Nixon “I Am Woman”
(more to come ... LOL)
Wherefore God also hath highly exalted him, and given him a name which is above every name: Philippians 2:9 (KJV)
ARE YOU READY FOR THIS BLOG HOP?? Here you go:
Last November, she convinced her bank she didn’t have the money to keep making payments on her Michigan home on Lake St. Clair, even though she owned her Florida lakefront home free and clear.
Yes. “TROR” is the swedish word for believe. But first there was no concept, it became one. While I was working on the album, I was reading a lot about celtic mythology and egypt astronomy. Besides making music, I study photography and to find inspiration I often read books or watch movies. I was always interested in gods, mythology, astronomy, science fiction and supernatural things.
So this morning, over breakfast she had moved from taking stock of her garden to taking stock of her life and, most importantly, her marriage. In fact it seemed that her garden and her marriage were similar in far too many ways.
If wash was dingy and grey,
Van Sinderen's son, also named Adrian Van Sinderen, was a lawyer practicing in Brooklyn and Manhattan. In 1867 he became executor of the estate of his late friend William Lawrence and for many years Lawrence's family received income from the estate as planned. In 1886, one of the heirs discovered some "irregularities" in Van Sinderen's accounting and applied to the court to have him removed as executor. It was soon discovered that the entire estate had been squandered and Van Sinderen was indicted for grand larceny. He promptly fled to Europe, leaving his family behind.
A journalist was ducking around with a camera and talking to two girls. They talked of bulldozers. Two army cars with guns. Posessions in the tents just destroyed. The journalist asked were there photographs of last night. Some online, apparently, but not much. Phones had been deliberately broken.
Sleep, oh sleep
(b) It shapes the loaf.
the options to increase re-cycling and reduce waste going to landfill as early as possible. Implement incentive schemes that will help boost re-cycling and reduce household waste. Find a better location for the waste treatment plant currently proposed at Pinkham Way that will allow bulk transport by canal and rail, for example the Industrial Estate in Upper Lea
and there is!
In case it's not obvious, I'm a bit of a crafter. I like to dabble in many different crafting areas and Michael wins the "Super Husband" award for being extremely understanding of my incessant desire to create and learn about new ways to create different things. I love to take materials and transform them into something useful and/or beautiful.
The film doesn’t just want McQuade to be an All-American Bad Ass, however; it wants McQuade to have feelings. He loves his daughter (they even share an awkward lip-to-lip kiss), and she loves him, proving he’s a good dad. Even though he’s divorced from his wife, they’re still friendly, proving he’s a good divorcee. He takes his daughter horseback riding, where he ogles Barbara Carrera, and then he just leaves with the new hottie, apparently abandoning his daughter at the track, which proves he can be a bad dad, but an understandable man. When the bad guys kill his wolf, McQuade is so overcome with grief that he pounds his fist into the dirt, then picks the dead dog up.
This is not a utopian dream about what could happen if we had all the money in the world. We must work with what we have been given. The American public higher education landscape is commonly portrayed as impoverished and out of balance financially and intellectually. Therefore, what can the everyday classroom teacher be expected, supported — and inspired — to do, without sacrificing standards and ideals?
Then she said, "I have a problem with delay. I always delay writing. I want to write but there are other things I do first."
”It’s no secret any more what’s happening on the coast,” Dr. Leatherman said. ”Ten years ago we didn’t have good data on erosion rates. Now we do, and we know about 90 percent of the coast is eroding.”
He looked surprised at my response and said he had started in May, why was I asking. I replied that what he just asked me was considered incredibly rude in tango etiquette, and that this milonga was not the easiest on beginners, so perhaps he should change his tactics if he wanted to have his invitations accepted.
Line the bottom with the prepare shortcrust pastry base. Tip: If youre lucky enough to have an adjustable ring mould, tighten it around the base to adjust the size or the liquid mousse will overflow on the sides OR bake a slightly bigger crust (and sponge) and adjust it inside your ring. This will ensure a beautiful layering!
GENEVA — The warmest year on record is a three-way tie: 2010, 2005 and 1998.
1/2 cup shredded carrots
Yesterday we spent the day at a Retriever Working Test and Dash had an opportunity to show off her retrieving skills. The test was organised by Sue and Dave Forder and Anne and Geoff Skelton and the venue was the wonderful farm part-owned by Geoff and Anne out in the Midlands beyond the Dargle valley.
Blond bombshells, cultured and refined
These redemptions cause the fund to hold more money in cash than it would like and prevents it from being fully invested at the most opportune time.
Product Code / Size / Ship By / Total Price (RM)
These cute little Skittles holders are going to be given to my Nieces and Nephews on Easter!!
In comparing how Holiday differs from Dance Party in the Balkans, Bethancourt explains, “I've definitely been influenced by Berlin on this album - much more electronic than the last, heavily based on synths, bass, and dancier drums and with hints of minimal house elements creeping in ever so slightly. Even within the album itself I can hear a progression of the Berlin electronic music scene influencing me more and more with the amount of time I spent here. The Berlin techno parties and all night dance marathons were big inspirations for me.
I’M STILL A MUSIC JUNKIE
I found a lot more action, suspense, romance and even loss in this book. There isn't a page in this book that you don't feel someway connected to the story as if that is what you're going through at a moment in time or perhaps even while your reading.
The nurse helped me up and into a wheelchair (my first time in one) and took me to the room where we’d stay overnight. My legs totally felt like they didn’t work. Otherwise, I felt great! When the nurse wheeled me out of the L&D area, our family was waiting. I told them it was the hardest work I’d ever done with the best result ever. I remember feeling so incredibly
While the Sugarcubes were taking a sabbatical between 1989-90, bassist Bragi and keyboard player Magga formed a cabaret duo Caviar. This later developed into a lighthearted big-band, Hljomsveit Kondr`ads B, which played Icelandic versions of popular British and American standards ("Wonderful World" was one). Various Sugarcubes and members of Reptile and HAM (two groups signed to the 'Cubes' Bad Taste organisation), swelled the ranks to nearly a dozen, with each musician alternating on each other's instruments. Björk played clarinet.
too short
There are many examples on Twitter of people mocking Stephen Harper’s bizarre claim today that the NDP didn’t support fighting Hitler. “How could they?” sane and educated people would ask incredulously, since the NDP did not exist in its present form until the 1960s (nearly 30 years after the start of WWII, and many years after the death of Hitler).
CTMH Ink Star Spangled Blue
Judy Wise I sustain the fantasy. That life is good, that people are always kind, that I can accomplish anything I want. I believe it and then I do it, whatever I choose to do. I think you cannot create easily or well unless you are living right and by that I mean your work must be infused with love and compassion and you must be good to the people who need you. If your head isn't clear your work will not sing.
But things didn’t all go to plan for Redknapp’s supporters. Following his crushing defeat of Newcastle, his Spurs team went on a run of just a solitary victory in the next nine games as their title charge, genuine before Christmas, began to fell away. On the evening of his second victory since the beginning of February, Sunday’s 2-0 win over Blackburn, came news that England had indeed approached a candidate for their vacant position, but it wasn’t Redknapp. West Bromwich Albion’s Roy Hodgson was the man and such was the FA’s faith in their pursuit of the 64 year old, he was confirmed in the position just 48 hours later. Reaction was one of unnconviction in the media, uninspiration from those duly behind Redknapp’s volatility and the maverick-like pilancy he would bring to the job, but any dissatisfaction was all to drift off into the ether of carelessness as the FA had their man, the man they believed to be the correct choice and objectors fell on deaf ears.
After a relaxing break from running (and enjoying Disney World with Grant), it was nice to get back to running today. I must admit that I was a bit nervous about how I would feel today, especially if I had lost any cardiovascular conditioning. In reality, returning to running wasn’t half as bad as I imagined it would be.
"Robert and I have known each other since we were teenagers - he was in the year above me at school. Apparently I gave him a folky compilation tape, but at school he was really cool and liked David Bowie and guitar rock. We had an on/off relationship for many years before getting together about 20 years ago now and I think I gave him the tape when we finally got together."
- Publicly Champion the Importance of Arts Education: As president, Barack Obama will use the bully pulpit and the example he will set in the White House to promote the importance of arts and arts education in America . Not only is arts education dispensable for success in a rapidly changing, high skill, information economy, but studies show that arts education raises test scores in other subject areas as well.
Another blog post… but not just ANY blog post…
Don't panic...as it's a busy time of year I will be allowing a few extra weeks for us to work on our pieces.
By 1893, the Great Northern Railway had been completed. Its trestled tracks twisted through the Cascades and over the Rockies, all the from St. Paul, Minnesota and beyond. Men with names like Washington, Smith, Stevens, Schwabacher, Nordstrom would soon carve a Pacific Northwest 20th-century culture out of the wild Washington woods.
Do you prefer doing comedic work or writing?
When you work graveyard shifts, you are forced to mess with your sleep schedule. Sometimes, this means trying to fit a nap into your daily routine so you don’t pass out at 3AM while on shift, and sometimes it means staying up as late as you can the night before a shift to prepare yourself. Tonight is one of the latter nights. Usually, these nights will consist of activities like: resisting the urge to snack, dozily surfing the internet, or some combination of video games, movies, and porn. Also, porn. Lots of porn. But I digress.
As far as the hunting accident involving Mr. Egan and Ms. Simmons, no law or regulation can fix stupid.
The cold weather will continue through Sunday and Monday with highs of around 52F (11C) and lows of 28F (-2C).
Ok, now here's the bad news... I don't have a pattern. I got it from one of the veteran teachers and I have no idea where they got it from. But, I have a plan! To make your own, find a clipart image of an owl. Print and cut out the large sections onto a manilla file folder to make a pattern- then cut out the individual pieces for your kiddos. It takes a little while to cut out, but I think the results are so worth it! Also, use colored hole punch protectors to add some colors to the eyes. And googly eyes are a must. :)
Me: So, why is the Command Center parked right here?
And finally, we have the maxi dress. What I love about the maxi dress (aside from what I wrote about here, is that is can be dressed up or down depending on the occasion. So you can pair it with wedges and wooden bangles for a more casual wedding or with fancy heels and chandelier earrings for a more formal event. Of course, not all maxis can do double duty, but the one with the right material, cut and pattern will. And while none of these maxis are black tie, they come pretty darn close.
We turn next to the prophet Micah who asks, “Shall we come before God with burnt offerings? Will God be pleased with thousands of sacrificed rams? Shall we give our firstborn for our transgressions? Shall we sacrifice our children for the sins of our souls? No! God has told us what is good and what is expected of us: that we seek justice, love kindness and live humbly” (6.8).
Somehow you’ll escape all that waiting and staying. You’ll find the bright places where Boom Bands are playing. With banner flip-flapping, once more you’ll ride high! Ready for anything under the sky. Ready because you’re that kind of a guy!
Time to remove the cake from the pan. I was worried about this step because the pan-preparation directions had nothing about spraying the parchment paper or the sides of the pan. I'd been fretting about that ever since I noticed. I considered just spraying the pan, but then I remembered my baking mantra: "Rose has her reasons."
Think About Decanting your Wine
Hosley joins his Virginia Tech teammate David Wilson in New York. He has a lot of potential to be a star. He lead the nation in interceptions two years ago, however, his production dropped down last season considerably. Another problem with Hosley is that he failed a drug test at the scouting combine, but the Giants felt his talent made him worth the risk. The Giants already have three good cornerbacks on their roster including Corey Webster, Terrel Thomas, Prince Amukamara. He could see a starting role as the punt returner. Jerry Reese seems confident in his pick. “He is not a big man but this guy has athletic arrogance and plays like a big guy,” general manager Jerry Reese said. “He kind of reminds me of Adam Jones, he plays kind of like that. He runs like a little linebacker. He has outstanding cover skills. We expect him to be in our nickel package and the bonus is he returns punts and kicks. He has a lot of good qualities that we like.”
I came here to figure things out. To get into situations, to learn, grow and expand. By figuring out what it is I next want. Like buying a car, one decides on the make, model, year, price, color…. Then buys it, to decorate, furnish, accessorize, add to it all the things that make it mine, individually to my taste. Many times with others suggestions, some that we really don’t want, but do to not hurt another’s feelings (instead of just trusting ourselves completely) Dating, marrying, associating with others, going to school, getting jobs, living somewhere, moving somewhere… on and on the list goes. Just that when it goes wrong, falls apart, changes, or we change, we keep digging around in yesterday, trying to put it back together, fix it, destroy it further…
She was interested in her surroundings, for instance, that many bird varieties were pushed out by mynahs and crows eating up the insects and vegetation. She discovered the curator of the gardens had cleared wild grasses and swing fogged for mosquitoes, killing off insects they fed on. She stopped this and the bird varieties returned. She surrounded the swimming pool with free flowering scented flowers and derived great pleasure smelling them as she swam.
AG: That’s true. It’s just that my way of doing science changed. What happened to me, the reason that I lost the joy of science, was because I had made it into a professional trip. I lost the ideal way of doing science, which is the spirit of discovery, the curiosity, the spirit of knowing truth. So I was not searching for truth anymore through science, and therefore I had to discover meditation, where I was searching for truth again, truth of reality.
After eating, my group half-heartedly started playing a second round of bowling, but we didn’t finish since we were all starting to drift. I was watching Isabel because she had found some nice tween girl in the arcade area to stalk. I think it started as Isabel just watching her play the different games in awe/jealousy. But the girl made a fatal flaw. When one of the games gave her a single ticket…..she gave it to Isabel. Hence, the beginning of the stalking. The girl was so nice to Isabel and didn’t seem to mind in the least, and for that I thanked her. She gave Isabel 14 tickets, and Isabel knew exactly what to do with them. How I don’t know….must be something in kid DNA that just tells them. Kind of like that part of your brain that makes you breathe automatically. Anyways, after acquiring tickets, Isabel scoped out her potential loot.
Pistons in the movement move the bellows. As one expands the other one
* What inspired you to write A Most Improper Magick?
It really was an easy project, but extremely time consuming (and I was making two at once.)
I don't know where to turn, I don't know where to go,
I noticed right away that something wasn't quite right with his left eye, but thought he was just still waking up. When we went into the other room, I noticed the hives around the back of his neck. I was scratching and a little more clingy than usual. Lifting his shirt, he didn't have them anywhere else on his body, so I decided to call the pediatrician's office to find out what I should do. It was still early enough they might be able to get him in that day, I thought. When I called, I had to leave a message for the nurse and while waiting for her to call me back, Samuel was doing normal boy stuff: jumping off of the Wii Balance Board and saying "Mom! Watch this! Didja see that?"
